LADY OTTOLINE MORRELL & D'ARCY CRESSWELL-
I am suitably intrigued by the story, the way it’s being presented, and I do love a strong, sexy female lead… right Bo?
Says Jesus was a Sorcerer, Sanhedrin 43a . Says Jesus ("Yeshu" and in footnote #6, Yeshu "the Nazarene") was executed because he practiced sorcery. Horrible Blasphemy of Jesus, Gittin 57a . Says Jesus ( see footnote #4) is being boiled in "hot excrement." Sanhedrin 43a . Jesus deserved execution: "On the eve of the Passover, Yeshu was hanged...Do you suppose that he was one for whom a defence could be made? Was he not a Mesith (enticer)?"
and i have a new life
The AM believes this makes it easy for such children to be identified and put at risk of bullying.
Additional Vegan Sides: Soy Milk, if you are looking for a soy latte, this is the place.
If you want to dump your "sh*t" in someone else's backyard, you host disussion (sic) groups prior to town meeting in homes throughout the town.
All of this is by way of saying that we did have rain here and the air is cooler. The sky is still heavy and overcast -- no stars -- and the cars and trucks are still humming their way past the gym, over there on the highway.
I am not really one for New Year's Resolutions, but I do have some goals for 2010:
Both can also be found along my sidebar with handy dandy follow buttons!
For this first attempt at a reading challenge, I'm not going to be strict! Speculative fiction for me includes anything from the realm of science fiction, fantasy or horror - doesn't matter what subgenre, or whether it is tie-in fiction. I'm aiming to make this as inclusive as possible.
Pragmatism, by its very nature as a word, implies deciding what to do on the basis of the expected practical outcomes of options. But for many people "pragmatism" also implies that simply following principles, ideals, might often be unworkable in terms of outcome.
What I want from the Logos App is:
Your chance to leave a comment and enter will close Friday, May 4, 2012 at 10:00 AM EST. Winner will be chosen randomly from the computer program The Hat and announced here on Friday the 4th.
Now I wanted to hear more – the whole song at least, and others too. So I got on the internet and found a video of the performance and thought I’d share it with you. If you’re my age maybe you have the same fond memories of Danny Kaye that I have. If you’re much younger and are not familiar with him, here’s a chance to make the acquaintance of a fabulous entertainer and a wonderful human being.
103 How sweet are your words to my taste;
Wilberforce linked up with like-minded Britons in combating slavery, and he and several other abolitionists moved together to Clapham Common, a neighborhood in southwest London. Given their close proximity, the group’s quest to end slavery was an constant topic of conversation. Being in the same area of town allowed the reformers to encourage one another in their efforts to raise public awareness.
as words are water weeping
This week, I'm starting research projects with our fifth graders. After being introduced to the flipped classroom, I've made it a practice to create or find videos that review the concepts I teach. I post those videos on our LibGuide. That way, teachers and students can watch the videos later if they need to review.
An earlier comment suggested the possibility that if a god “turned up,”- i.e., appeared in some form that we humans could recognize, then it would be possible to determine using the scientific method to prove that he existed. But it wouldn’t. Because there are no forms under which a god could appear that we could be scientifically certain was divine. Think about it: how would God have to appear to convince scientists that it was a god and not a natural form?
After fifty years of earning a good living as a public relations counselor and a provider of editorial skills, the market for my skills has contracted in response to the economy. That’s my SOTU. I am confident that, when the economy improves, there will be individuals, corporations, trade associations and others who will rev up their efforts to influence consumers and issues, but until then, while the President lives off the fat of the land, I am pretty much living off my “fat.”
3) To stand by your man - even if you don't agree with him! There were a few times Dad raised his daughter rather um, old school wise. Much to my HUGE resentment. Mom hugged me, counseled me, agreed it wasn't fair, even talked to Dad on my behalf. But when he stuck to his guns, she stuck by his side...in a loving way, saying "Dad has his reasons for wanting to protect you and I have to support him. We'll get through this together."
02 - Flirting With Disaster 05:41
Fast & Fabulous C Great $7.00
JohnMark Triplett and Jeremy Hibnick
And yet there is hypocrisy in the church. We do give reasons for unbelievers to stay far away. So while preaching the gospel and exposing self-righteousness in all its forms (homosexual, straight, covetous or idolatrous), let us continually submit ourselves to the Word and Spirit of God, pleading that He remove everything which harms His testimony, everything that gives the world opportunity to mock our dear Savior.
~ Toast the yellow beans until slightly brown and washed clean.
But if I was put in the terrible situation Sookie finds herself in—knowing the man I love and want to be with expects me to do this thing to make it possible for us to be together, or that I can save my best friend Michael’s life, I’d save my friend and deal with the heart ache of the loss of my relationship. Every time. Sookie and I don’t have a lot in common, but we have that.
And began kicking and screaming
This is not the item included in the previous post; I should have been clearer. Anyhow—sometimes ethical. If your partner has no problem with you using porn, then by all means, carry on. But, if your partner objects on the grounds of self-esteem issues, feeling unwanted, etc., then it would be unethical to simply carry on without discussing the problem.
Friday. An appointment at 2. Which always means that I do zilch with the rest of the day, using the getting ready, and getting to, as the "thing to do" for that day. It was with the psychiatrist who I succeeded in bribing the 14 year old to see 2 weeks and 2 days before. 2 days and 2 weeks of me wondering what she'd concluded from the mere hour (and bulging file of notes from other professionals) that she'd seen him for. Seen his anger, irritation, resentment...
Essentially allowing developers and publishers to price their software accordingly, the only thing that would really change is you would get what you paid for.
JA: My uncles were selling beautiful clothes. One aunt was a window dresser for very stylish stores. So I always loved stylish clothes. One of my uncles was very found of art and paintings and would buy a lot of them. I loved to go to his house and see them. Unfortunately my parents did not have money enough to offer me a stylish life.
Add the onions and fry till it turns light brown
Suppressing the rights of one group in deference to the beliefs of another group is disturbingly anti-American, even if our history is littered with such episodes. Our forefathers claimed to found this country on the idea that all men are created equal, even if their vision at the time was somewhat... uh, limited. But we've added clauses to that original idea as time has passed -- equal: no matter their gender, no matter the color of their skin, no matter their religious beliefs, no matter.
Eowyn
It was not man’s choice. It was not done according to the flesh. It was the choice of the Lord and we have two infallible proofs showing it was God’s will and not the will of man.
The last dish I made, which actually didn’t end up being eaten by myself or my guest (but has since been eaten by me and my roommate) was a mango avocado tomato salad. It actually turned out pretty yummy.
I can't tell you. It's a secret ^^
Pour 1/2 cup of milk in a pan, add 1 tbsp butter, boil. Add 1 cup of buckwheat flour, boil until thick mixture forms and let it cool to room temperature. Then pour in yeast diluted in warm water, mix and let the dough rise. Then add prepared millet, rest of the flour, raw yolks beaten with sugar, salt. Pour in warm milk, thoroughly mix and let dough rise again. Add whipped egg whites and bake blini.
He has a sweet-ass car.
This man here, the leader of boyband C.N.BLUE,
Despite, once again, not being the target audience, I found myself in many ways relating to Finley in her issues with anxiety and trying to make everything perfect. The story was so well written that aside from the characters ages and a few typical teen themes, it could really be enjoyed by a much larger (and older) audience as well. I always love books that paint a great picture in my head of the places I'm reading about and I must say that this was definitely one of those. Several times throughout the book I found myself telling my husband that I'd love to go to Ireland one day!! Overall, I really enjoyed this book and I look forward to reading more by the writer!
When O started chipping up the cement floor, we actually found old clay tiles underneath.
So she and her kids made it to the median, but then the 4-year-old squirmed away and got killed by a drunk driver. The driver was convicted of a hit and run. The mom was convicted of vehicular manslaughter. Yep. But as Goldberg says:
Reality spins a wheel.
The peace of Christ which is beyond understanding has worked in and through me. And that peace could not have been found on a three week vacation. It required entering daily into the mine of prayer. Daily, over the course of months. (This has not stopped). Finding peace required much confession and loving counsel. Peace was not gained like some loaf of bread to be picked up on aisle one. Peace emerged in tiny nuggets--minute, yet treasured fragments of authenticity and truth; extracted from massive boulder-sized frustration, selfish ambition, grief, and even some unknown resentment that I had been carefully and diligently sweeping under the rug of my psyche.
cos I sell what I dont need... means they would be just rubbish...but they can be at '100yen' at a flea market!
Hi everyone! Happy Friday. I hope you've all managed to get through the week without too much of a struggle. And if you did, please tell me how?
Amen. I'm glad that someone with public visibility, like Charles, is asking these questions.
Second, the venue was huge, but the booths weren't arranged well. By 4 pm, when all the riff raff were in the building, and lines for the Texas beers reached fifty or sixty people, it was difficult to navigate. The place looked to me to be big enough to arrangle the booths in a single line back to back. That might have made the navigation a bit easier.
Now we just have to wait till the city secedes from South Korea; it then achieves a kind of limited national sovereignty; it seats a robot-ambassador at the UN; its Artificially Intelligent offspring form a Parliament, or a Ministry of War; they manufacture cannons and other violent forms of propulsive enginery, filling the sky with drones; and then human history becomes interesting again.
I twist my hair carefully,
I don’t watch any of the morning shows, and I never have, so I don’t miss this tradition and maybe I’m not comprehending something crucial here (but I doubt it).
is owned by Robyn Weinrib. Robyn offers a wonderful variety of digital stamps and digital papers designed to meet the needs of all digital paper crafting addicts for every occasion.
However, I have some reservations about the male vs female character of church argument. In a similar vein is the book “Why Men hate going to Church” which explores the same apparent divide. Is this a real point of division or an imaginary one based on observations of the church demographic?
How Come My Bulldog Don't Bark by Howard Tate
The young single mother appeared in the studio looking tan, with her long, dark hair tumbling down her back. While she denies being a ‘prostitute,’ she said she requested ‘a little present’ of $800.
Restrooms and showers are on one side of the living unit as well as washer and dryers. We were told that offenders will be allowed to wear “civilian clothes” most likely meaning sweat shirts and pants and t-shirts while in the living units but will be required to be fully dressed in state issued clothing any time they leave the housing unit.
d Burhan Ghaliun
- Nope. No jubes neigh wuh that wee smick strokin' mah beag.
These 8 GB’s regarding storage creates games, applications, movies, new music, pictures, and also video talk with friends and family as elementary as it comes. In addition, you never have to worry about your tablet not having enough room for important e-mail, websites, as well as texts.
Her stove, and lays out food in tins.
The misses were odd today, almost like Little Moose was having trouble relaxing. He just had a big growth spurt and has gotten so much stronger in his core. I know his bladder has grown, but I wonder if core strength affects sphincter control too. Something to ponder anyway. One of the misses I knew he had to go, and he was fussing. He sat on my lap for a bit and then pushed himself up to stand (he likes to do that when being supported) and then peed. Interesting. He did it one other time too. The other misses I just didn’t get in time after he roused from a nap, or Daddy Man happened to be holding him.
In the third sequence, we see the killers forced to change clothes. Jules never returns to the story, or his original suit. This is tied to his abandonment of a role, an abandonment of a set of tasks. Vince, who returns to being a killer, cannot conceive of this:
Yes Face IPA (4.5%), South of Taylor Special (4.5%), and the non-session but what the hell I'll throw it in anyway East Griffin Stout (5.0%). Now there's a session beer line-up! They do have non-session guest taps, too, so you can take your big-beer insistent buddies along (and carry them out if they try keeping up with you).
Past the rice, beans, soup mix...blah blah boring.....through the chocolate, cookies and confiture...eh....not in the mood.....dried pasta....blech.....weird packaged sauce....ew......my eyes widened as I found a bag of what looked like....YES IT IS.....WHOOOOOOOAAAAAA......my favorite candy in the whole entire universe.....BUBBLEGUM. A GIIIIIIANT BAG OF BUBBLEGUM.
Happy Easter, happy weekend. Some chocolate from the chocolatier in the town near ours, Le Show Colha -- if you pronounce it; it comes out sort of like the pronunciation of chocolat in French (sort of).
I GIVE ALL THE GLORY TO GOD
Just as Abraham’s seed was received via holy spirit and a promise, concerning Isaac, likewise, Christians receive the holy spirit, for it was the spirit through a promise that gave birth to Isaac, just as it is for spiritual Israel, including Gentiles, they become Abraham’s children via the promise of the spirit.
when we finally introduced ourselves to them, and he said his name was brad (!!!!!), sean choked back his laughter in an awkward way and i did my best to pull it together!
Those of you familiar with the deeply charming Animals of Maple Hill Farm, or with A Visit to William Blake's Inn which won both the Newbery Award and a Caldecott Honor in 1982 might be surprised that anything by the Provensens could be that disturbing.
Flicking through profiles, I was thinking.. Why are a lot of women fixated on the idea of being with a ‘bad boy’? I’ve seen a large number of profiles where the women LOOOVE ‘bad boys’!! Why is this?
I think I've known Denise for about 7 years, she quickly became involved in local HE politics in North Yorkshire after pulling her son out of school. I know that I liked her immediately - didn't everyone?! She was clearly someone who wasn't going to take any crap, but she had this great diplomatic (yet with a subtle hint of sarcasm) quality about her which was a great combination when dealing with the LA.
Wither by Lauren DeStefano (February 2012, Harper Voyager, ISBN: 0007386982)
The next match on MNR was Beth Phoenix vs. Nikki Bella. Since I didn’t actually watch this match, I can’t comment on it, but apparently Nikki Bella is the new Divas Champion, if anyone cares.
I am his mother. I know better then you do about my son. I know what happened to him. You don't. I don't care what that study that was funded by a vaccine company says. I don't care that the people who say vaccines are safe or not (who happen to be share holders in the particular vaccine that is up for approval) says.
So, my lucky husband got 2 special handmade cards( and a store bought one from my daughter). I had made a card at a Stamp'nUp card camp and gave it to my daughter about a week ago. Well, she forgot it at her apartment. Ugh. Okay, so she has one for next year.
I really enjoy reading about The Queen Saints such as St. Helena a innkeeper whom married a roman general who ends up being a great Roman Emperor in the year 292, Also St. Clotilda, Queen of the Franks, St. Sexburga an English queen, St. Matilda a Germany queen around the year 918 to name a few. I never heard of these inspiring saints. It was very pleasing to read about Queen Isabella the Catholic (which I knew about). "A great queen, indeed, a great wife, a great mother, and all this because she was first of all a great Catholic...""
2 x a small sewing kit for emerency mending, a needle book, one or two sewing needles and small wooden thread spools (I will provide small thread snippers, and all the other parts could ofcourse be made by different people.)
June 19: Winnipeg – Winnipeg Jazz Fest
You love to write words and numbers
Madelyn took the initiative to use Google Images for the animals who eat algae (her topic) and illustrated her report. Note the "!" near the algae--apparently it knows it is on everyone's menu.
Jesus’ warning to these apostates who rejected Him as their ancestors rejected
In 2010, “the future of the euro” took center stage in Spain as Spanish Prime Minister Luis Rodriguez Zapatero was joined by numerous financial heavyweights to try and solve the crisis as Bilderberg members panicked about the possible collapse of the single currency.
I loved my Indian Blanket. Ell Oh Vee Eeed it. It was soft and warm and richly colored, stitched with organically intricate precision. On Saturday afternoons while my mother vacuumed I would create a pallet on the floor in my bedroom and curl up in it with a myriad of stuffed animals to take a nap. Those were the best naps ever as far as childhood memories go.
I can't say that I will ever get completely back to the way I was before this happened. Things that I thought mattered... they don't... and I realized what does.
all of it ...
What IS this!? After not being sick all year I just didn’t even know what to do. Unprepared, I sent out word that I was seeking any and all medication my housemates could offer. My friends rose magnificently to my request and I was soon stock piled with cough drops, cough syrup, dayquil and nyquil.
“I wanted it to be tall so it stands out,” she told Us Weekly. “The design of the bottle is almost like a gown so it represents me on the carpet. The lips are fun… it makes it more youthful and you can play with it.”.
In Lebanon, Jews were kidnapped and murdered during 1967. Following a series of kidnappings and murders of Jews, the murder of one of them, Dr. Albert Elia in September 1971, signalled to Jews that it was time to depart.
It was a fun day, even if it was a little drizzly in the morning.
As I walked back in the rain, not a single person was there at the track. I guess everybody turned back when it started raining. Despite the weather, I had a good time. Solitude with nature can really ease a heavy heart and brings peace to the soul. Along the way, I saw birds chirping, two big eagles soaring high and I felt as one with nature.
Communication and kindness have an important role in any relationship.
Now wraps her close, now arching leaves her bar
Then this morning came.
An example of a socially responsible entrepreneur that you may be very familiar with is the British chef, Jamie Oliver. Beyond his amazing culinary empire, Jamie identified a need to give back to society by offering career opportunities to troubled youth who otherwise were heading for disaster. He started the 15 Apprentice Program, which has also become a TV reality series. The program consists of identifying 15 young people and putting them through a very rigorous culinary program with the overall goal of turning them into professional chefs. If you want to read more about it here is the link:
important notice :
Sometimes, quarrels erupt; they have less room.
And where there is a culture of watching, the next logical step is to become a critic. “The preaching was too long. The music is too loud. The parking is too crowded. The children’s ministry is too disorganized.”, and on and on.
Something that I've noticed over the past couple of years while travelling the blogosphere is that the "Gamers in the Basement" image seems to be very prevalent, particularly in the US and Canada.
Whimsy's Ann Vento's Sentiment
Mike FULLER Will Call Arnold SCHWARZENEGGER In Sacramento Tomorrow Monday To Prepare The AMENDMENT ISSUE: All Americans Can Be Candidates!!
Do you even wonder what your pet is thinking when
Liberty Island
Occasion:
I think this will be a Thursday thing --- See ya Thursday!!
I got this sweet tshirt in the mail from Brittany formerly of Molly Lou Gifts Blog! I have made the sweetest friends via blogging! It is adorable!
These are serious allegations that continue to go unanswered not only by the State officials involved, but by any State official at all!
Don't you just hate it when you find out about something that you really would have loved to have seen but are about 3 years too late? I just learned of a gorgeous art/design/textile exhibition in Venice that took place at the Palazzo Fortuny (Textile god Mariano Fortuny's home and workshop) that I would have loved to have seen in person. Living in New Orleans where elegance and decadence (not to mention Masquerade Balls and Carnival) are events de rigueur, I have always had an affinity for Venice. So when I saw these gorgeous images of the Roberto Cappucci exhibition at the Palazzo Fortuny, I pinned them all over my studio for inspiration.
Holy day, love
This not a new theory about autism, I believe it was first set out in a published journal paper in 2006. This theory appears to have some similarities with the “Intense World” theory of autism that was the creation of Henry Markram, Tania Rinaldi and Kamila Markram, and would explain the same sorts of phenomena that the intense world theory would explain. The theory also quite obviously brings to mind the popular idea that autistic people are “visual thinkers”, an idea which has been popularized by the autistic author Temple Grandin. I’m not sure if she was the original source of this idea.
Windsor's use of vintage in every room works especially when paired with modern. In House Besutiful's article about her own home they talk about her practical and whimsical style; so prevelant in these kids rooms.
Simplicity is not about reducing ourselves to a smaller size - it is about clearing the clutter and chaos to create the space to grow into our true selves.
Book choice one: Malory Towers by Enid Blyton
The elements of magical philosophy I’ve covered in recent posts here on The Archdruid Report aren’t simply an odd fit for a discussion on peak oil; they also contradict some of the most basic habits of contemporary thought. Thus it’s come as a pleasant surprise to see how many of my readers have been able to keep up with the discussion, and even to anticipate the issues to be raised in the next post. My post two weeks ago, A Choice of Contemplations, was no exception; several commenters thought about the principle that "what you contemplate, you imitate," noted that a great many people in the peak oil movement spend a great deal of time contemplating worst case scenarios, and worried aloud that this habit might conceivably help bring those worst case scenarios about.
Best of all is the way he calls out the coded momma's boy (TV's Oscar Madison) for wasting the fertile years of said brainy, ill-banged (in both senses) daughter, played by Joanne Woodward. The DVD extras tell that Newman and Woodward were hot, crazy lovers at the time and spent their weekends driving off to luxury hotels to shack up for marathon lovemaking sessions, which probably explains why Woodward's character comes off as the most comfortable-in-her-own-skin 21-year old virgin in cinema. We also learn from the extras that Welles re-wrote his scenes and no one could understand a word he said.
4) Even little acts can inspire: I have been incredibly touched by all those who have reached out to me telling me the ways in which this story has brought wonder and love to their own lives. Some recently single ladies, recently divorced men, even couples, have emailed me to share with me their own new york city tales of love and loss and how this tiny blog inspired them to fall in love with their city all over again. I truly believe that my journey is not unique,but is one we are all sharing together. This city is full of amazing people, doing amazing things, and I am just honored to be a part of the celebration of life and love.
My novella for adults, currently called 'Mondays with Marguerite', is finished and looking for a home. It's written from the point of view of a woman with Alzheimer's and is also the story of her 11 year old great grand-daughter, who has troubles of her own. The two of them make friends and their stories intertwine. It could be difficult to find a publisher, as it's only 40,000 words. We'll see. I may decide to release it as an eBook on my own.
At 9:30 that morning I got a text from Mickey. His firm had merged; he'd call me later. Third, in years of experience, in a 10 person firm, he'd had no clue.
There was some scraplifting involved here. (Hey, I'm sick and it's sucking all energy and creativity from my bones!!!) For instance, this card was inspired by this one I found on Pinterest. I made my own version of her "Tell Me" card I made this one using the quatrefoil overlays from Mel Stampz. I am in LOVE with these things! She has tiny dots, moroccan tile, damask... they're easy and you can make patterned papers to match whatever you're doing. I love that she offers them for free too. I was able to make the red perfectly match the text on the photo, which I pulled from one of the book covers using the eyedropper tool. Everything matches!!!
and of course a phenomenal mother and grandmother.
In the process, the talk of Mack Brown moving into the athletic director’s office by 2011 stopped. So did the speculation that head coach-designate Will Muschamp would then take over on the Texas sidelines…
Again, I speak from experience. When I sin, it is often because I am not content with what God has given me. I want more. I am not convinced that what I have is enough. I am not convinced that the resources, whether physical or emotional or spiritual, that God has given me are sufficient. It is in that moment that my heart becomes fertile ground for sin.
Uno: I think almost everything is better in a foreign language. I'll watch foreign soap operas, but can't stand American ones; I like more foreign pop songs than American. I guess the foreign language factor just ups their interest factor for me, and cultural differences have always interested me.
but, they are good kids-
Mind racing with the thoughts of meeting old friends again before the annual RWB festival. The lads would all be there I thought as I drifted to sleep Russell Green and the Black Country team. Simon Patton and the Wolverhampton boys. Richard Lumley, Bill Murray to name but a few of my kinsmen that I knew would answer the “call to arms”, I drifted off, filled with excitement and anticipation of the weekend ahead.
Being as awesome as he is, Kyono also set me up with Violet yesterday which, as it turns out, offers a whole different kind of instrumental rock pieces. A bit of it does resemble what can be found on the Red album and even more of it resembles the Blue album material, but indeed Violet is another creature. The first word that came to mind when trying to describe it was "playful" but not to worry - they still sound great and they are still to be played loud!
Read it all. As Shariah Finance Watch has pointed out for a long time, the sharia advisers are paid quite the pretty penny. But this piece really puts that in black and white, and points many of the broader flaws of governance in the sharia finance industry.
When we visited my daughter and her husband a couple of weeks ago, they took us to the Peach Festival in Lewiston, New York. The Peach Festival was interesting, and is fairly typical of small-town American festivals.
When choosing baby clothes for summer, you can’t go wrong with soft, lightweight cotton, but go easy on the layers. Delicate knit fabrics are also a great choice because they absorb perspiration which helps prevent rashes caused by sweat.
Of half-a-void thought
Protect Your Basement Floor
It was that word that proved itself to be the Word of the Lord for it was quick and powerful and sharper than a two-edged sword for it pierced right into the heart.
Ink - Memento Black, Prismacolor Pencils, Gamsol
"We had many good directors - John Carpenter, DePalma - but things have become polluted by business, money and bad relationships. The success of the horror genre has lead to its downfall."
There's been a splendid heat wave going on at the moment so I haven't had to worry to much about layering . However when I put this outfit together it wasn't quite as warm and I kept thinking how the weather over here has really tested my skills in the layering department.
When I was a young boy
Q097) Fill in the blanks of “I am weak towards ____♥”
In most cases, the no-contact provision can only be removed once the person you have been forbidden to contact goes to court and states the reasons why they want the provision lifted.
Finances: This is about your physical resources, and also the creation of value for others. It tends to be about money, but that’s just one kind of resource. There are other forms of value exchange besides money, even though that’s the main one.
5 considered
I was able to meet my sweet sister on skype and I am utterly and completely in love with her. Wishing more than anything that I was right there with her, but counting down the days until I'm holding her in my own arms.
held peace.
In a written response to a parliamentary question, Sisulu gave details of weapons that had "been stolen or gone missing" from the SANDF over the past three years.
"processing" material and letting go of past life blocks. Clients
We celebrated by rescuing a dog: Oliver. Of COURSE we did! Moving isn't nearly stressful enough!! I still have a strand or two of hair left, after all.
Also noted as a reference to these hard working individuals (please note these figures are from the 2011 SBT article outlining them as well as old Corporal ranks)
This links to a research study I initiated last week on the restorative benefits of spending time in nature that focuses on how spending time in nature impacts psychological well-being and stress levels. Participants in my study are completing a pre-nature experience and post-nature experience survey assessing their psychological well-being. We are also collecting participant heart rate and blood pressure readings to determine how spending time in nature is associated with stress levels. If you are interested in learning more about the research study please send me a message.
The last thing I’m out here to do is the main reason why I’m all the way out here and not sitting on the beach in San Diego writing. This is a little thing called money. I need some. But just a little is enough and the least amount of time/work involved the better. Stuff is cheap here and I don’t need a lot since I’m not really going anywhere or doing anything (like drinking, driving, etc. – and of course, not together) and there’s work out here that actually pays pretty well for a very small amount of time/effort out of me. It’s kind of win-win (if living in Minnesota in the winter can be considered a win).
The Democrats,of course simply voted as a bloc to bypass all this, so the increase is now on a fast track.
More later as warranted.
What exactly has Obama done for OWS idiots besides let them run rampant for so long? What other president would have put up with this reckless, degrading and embarassing behavior and why are the local officals allowing it? These protestors have stolen, raped, used violence, stunk up public parks like vagrants and have received loads media attention for it.
Question: Do you believe in the efficacy of prayer, and the value of prayer that is directed out of whole-hearted sympathy to the misfortune and suffering of others? Cannot prayer, in the right sense, ever bring about the freedom of which you speak?
But curses don’t like to be broken, and Reveka’s efforts lead her to deeper mysteries. As she struggles to understand the curse, she meets a shadowy stranger (as charming as he is unsettling) and discovers a blighted land in desperate need of healing. Soon the irreverent apprentice is faced with a daunting choice—will she break the curse at the peril of her own soul?
Comcast offers SEC baseball Friday, with Georgia taking on Florida, and ESPN2 has Sunday's game at 3 p.m.. It's off to the ACC for Comcast Sunday at 12:30 p.m., with Miami meeting Florida State.
The Co-op's looking fairly shabby now but it easily the best looking building in that part of town. A listing application failed in 2005. Shame the sign at least cannot be preserved.
I said my thanks to Dr Breathe and we parted company. I don't have to go back to see him unless something changes. Despite negative tests and the usual medical bafflement a bendy body causes, at no point did Dr Breathe make me feel disbelieved or negatively judged. He also understood the need to provide information for the DWP in writing. This means that I won't have to use up my time or his contacting him for a letter to provide to the DWP in a year or so's time when I'm no longer his patient and he's forgotten all the details.
While the Post reports White as having “long been bothered” by the haircutting incident,” he told ABC News he was not present for the prank, in which Romney is said to have forcefully cut a student’s long hair and was not aware of it until this year when he was contacted by the Washington Post.
O- Ovals, Our Daily Bread Designs, circles (shape)....
I said it. He just doesn’t cut it some days. You can gasp all you want, but yet, I know, that there are days when Jesus doesn’t cut it for you either.
Conditioned thought exists as the result of the subconscious absorption of environmental imprinting, which includes social, religious, historical and political influences, etc. The development of our relationship with our higher nature requires that we nurture the ability to transcend those aspects of conditioning that would hold us back.
The room was open no stalls
The movie fails as a romance. It fails as a comedy. It fails as political satire. It fails at being scary. It even fails at being enjoyably bad. It just exists.
The Cardigans – My Favourite Game
Be exactly who you want to be, do what you want to do
What if I decided to go to college right after high school instead of taking time off to work?
The child was holding an ice-cream!
Established in the late 1800’s as a hill station and retreat for the English at the time, it has become a popular destination for a weekend holiday and backpackers around the world.
Gular road, Dainik Rajpath wali gali
Friday I could not speak without sobbing and wailing, and could find no comfort in daily life. Finally, a phone call from a blessed friend assured me that “gratitude is greater than grief” and Miss Kitty’s message to me was to think of her as a “voluptuous being” who chose me (“Damn right, I did!”) and to know that beneath the horrible pain of loss rests the eternal love we shared for over a decade.
This years Tales to Sustain (T2S) gathering was a smaller more intimate gathering which I only just found out about a few weeks before. Thirteen other storytellers from around the UK bringing a vast amount of, but very differing, experience and approach.
President Joseph F. Smith said that “parents in Zion will be held responsible for the acts of their children, not only until they become eight years old but, perhaps, throughout all the lives of their children, provided they have neglected their duty to their children while they were under their care and guidance, and the parents were responsible for them.” (In Conference Report, Apr. 1910, p. 6.) President Benson (“The Honored Place of Woman”, Ensign, Nov. 1981, 104)
He had his first proper visit to The Purple Onion. We went down for the afternoon session although if he’d had his way we’d have been there at least two hours early because he couldn’t get out of the house quick enough, he was that excited. He was up, showered and dressed before I’d even roused myself properly, and once breakfast was finished he kept watching the clock, waiting for the hands to move to the 11:30 position (I’d shown him what they’d look like when they were showing us it‘d be time to go).
Here is a look at the collection!
Please leave a comment here and be a follower of this blog to qualify for my Blog candy which is a $9 Gift certificate to www.creativekuts2.com
Freddie Douglas (soprano & alto saxophones)
10. What did you hope to accomplish by writing The Hunt? Do you think you have accomplished what you set out to do?
This is what makes Sodeta, Spain an anomaly. Because every person in that town of 70 households, except one, recently went from poverty to wealth after winning Spain’s famous Christmas Lottery. It's a great story.
To the “99%” who see the gross inequalities of wealth distribution as well as tax codes, which allow wealth to accumulate unencumbered by the 1% and their cronies, this awareness manifests across the OWS as the demand “tax the rich”. “Tax the Rich” posters are ubiquitous and it appears that all labor, liberals, progressives and socialists come together around this demand.
The one thing I’m looking forward regarding Warmachine is the proposed tournament at my friendly game store. It’s supposed to be a 15pts team tourney, but the teams are to be randomly determined before the first match. Stuff like this happens a lot in Warmachine tournaments all over the world. The game is so damn fun there’s just no excuse not to make it even funner. There will be excellent matchups, and useless ones, and it will probably be a blast.
That was the moment. Then. I should have pretended I didn’t hear, carried on walking, ignored him and passed the moment by. But I didn’t. I replied.
Coarse kosher salt is the preferred salt for brining, but table salt (iodine-free) or sea salt can be used. Or, try a combination of flavored sea salt and kosher salt!
He has to keep His own Word.
In the summer months, I use two waterproof mascaras, instead of one waterproof and one washable. Of course everyone’s eyelashes are different, so this may not be the right approach for everyone. I’ll keep you posted with new fabulous mascara secrets that I discover.
Ultimately, with whatever accompanies the waves of changes that wash over our lives, it is still a journey of discovery, that chance to learn and listen, teach and speak of our experiences with one another... a movement of ideas, of physical location, of spiritual practice and of new thoughts embraced...
I've finished recording a new CD of wedding music samples. Brides these days...they just don't know how to work cassette tapes anymore! Really, it was time. My old demo tape had been recorded in my living room, by me, on the red boom box I'd had since my junior year of high school.
Barack leaving my life—at least as far as being lovers goes. In the same way that the relationship was founded on calculated boundaries and carefully, rationally considered developments, it seems to be ending along coolly considered lines. I read back over the past year in my journals, and see and feel several themes in it all … how from the beginning what I have been most concerned with has been my sense of Barack’s withholding the kind of emotional involvement I was seeking. I guess I hoped time would change things and he’d let go and “fall in love” with me. Now, at this point, I’m left wondering if Barack’s reserve, etc. is not just the time in his life, but, after all, emotional scarring that will make it difficult for him to get involved even after he’s sorted his life through with age and experience.
The film's sensuality is joined with its low-key suspense in the scene where Daisy takes a bath, stripping out of her clothes as steam from the water swirls around her, Hitchcock's editing playfully suggesting her impending nudity while cutting away just a second before she'd actually show anything immodest to the camera. In a distant hint of the bathroom terror of Psycho, Hitchcock then suggests that the lodger is going to break into the room: there's something so vulnerable about getting naked to bathe, and even at this early point in his career Hitchcock hints at what it would be like to get attacked like this. But of course, everything in this film is a feint, a misdirection, so once again the lodger's initially sinister-seeming actions turn out to be innocent. Hitchcock wanted to leave the resolution of the story ambiguous, as it was in the Marie Belloc Lowndes novel it's based on, but in a pattern that would recur several times in Hitchcock's later star vehicles, the studio didn't want to imply that a handsome matinee idol like Novello could be a killer.
Having been heartbroken in the past, Monica is reluctant to play this dangerous game with a confirmed heartbreaker. But it’s what she doesn’t know about Sean that she should be concerned about. Sean knows her well – too well, and it’s those secrets that have the potential to make her love him or hate him.
Feel the flow
These are nine excellent shorts that probe the diversity of loneliness when one feels like a stranger in a strange land whether a person is home or living in a foreign land.
Beauty, love, romance, and mystery weave together in a stunning novel that’s as seductive and surprising as the city of Venice itself.
6. It's Stew Time
The violence stemming from gang wars has swollen to such great proportions that law enforcers are finding it difficult to quell the unrest. These gangsters have been using sophisticated weapons including rocket propelled grenades and some of their local inventions like the Awan, a combination of a grenade and a rocket launcher. The police have returned fire by their Armored Personnel Carriers, which some believe are of little help as they frequently break down, are too large for the narrow lanes in Lyari and are not bullet proof. Other techniques like blocking mobile services in the area have also been used to disadvantage the criminals. But since they use walkie-talkies the only disadvantaged party are the common people who cannot communicate with each other. Although rangers and paramilitary forces have been called to reinforce the operation, the deteriorating living conditions have forced many families to abandon their homes for safer neighborhoods.
Luigi Ambit 1:46:581
We received quite a bit of rain overnight, although by the looks of the creek behind my apartment, we could certainly use some more rain. I’ll know more about that once I have done my walk for the day.
Juan Torres is the older, attractive friend of Gilberto Padilla. We first meet Juan when the other characters, Gabriella, Molly and Gilberto, travel to Puerto Rico. Juan is fourteen, while the others are just twelve years old. With Gabriella being mature for her age, Juan takes a liking to her right away. This is much to Molly’s dismay, as she developed a crush on Juan immediately. Juan is well-mannered like his friend Gilberto. He lives with his mother, next door to Gilberto’s vacation home in Puerto Rico. He displays confidence, and is pro-active when he wants something, or someone.
When asked what other jobs they’ve had, novelists usually have an oddball list. They may dream of job security and a health plan by night, but by day they are seduced by interesting experiences, diverse characters, a bit of income, and the flexibility to write.
Sellers know that home values have declined. If a Seller receives multiple offers, he may choose to only negotiate with the highest price offer. This helps him avoid the aggravation of trying to reach an agreement with other buyers if the price differential between asking and offer price is too great. Needless to say…if you were the buyer who made the “low ball” offer and didn’t get a “counter offer” back from the Seller as he chose to negotiate with another buyer, you will be frustrated & disappointed? You probably already knew that you’d offer higher but wanted to test the waters to see how low the Seller would go. Big mistake – especially if the house is priced appropriately and is in great condition. So how can you avoid these “blunders” in the future? Take note of the following:
To point people to their Savior
They are a little bit more expensive than other Magnolia stamps but I couldn't think of a better reason to buy them..
We are saddening that Ryan pass away but it’s also a reminder to all of us after drinking and driving is no driving.
I look forward to seeing serious developments in this area, which will provide practical guidelines for judges, lawyers and the litigants themselves.
Jen Bradford The content of my paintings changes pretty frequently, but has maintained several characteristics I guess one could call a "style". I build up many many layers, and move back and forth between building up and sanding, rubbing, scraping away - deciding what to preserve and what to let go. There is usually a tension between structure (defined shape, a grid, stencil, etc.) and chaos from experimenting.
I think that’s maybe why I don’t talk about the girl in the red dress much anymore. She is my past. Red Dress Girl will always be a part of who I am. My present, my future are what they are because of her and the battles she fought. But she no longer defines me.
By Luverta Reames
So is Magic Neighbor. The fact that an artist can produce her best work nearly 20 years into a solo career that hasn’t exactly set the world on fire is (may I say?) remarkable. That the same artist only got started well into her fourth decade proves that Pop is not exclusively a young (or someone pretending to be a young) person’s game, and that creativity need not diminish with age. It’s inspiring that a musician as distinctive as Lisa Germano continues to remain true to her own musical intuition while expanding its possibilities. Magic Neighbor is a little more impressionistic than most Germano recordings (French Impressionistic to be exact). Not as tranquil-sounding as In The Maybe World, though every bit as melodic, there’s also a degree of luminousness in the subject matter here that is not usually found on a Lisa Germano album. That may bode well for those of you who are unwilling to hang tough with Lisa for fear of reaching for the stop button (or the razor blade), just like me several months ago. I won’t make that mistake again.
5. Scarlet Ribbons (For Her Hair)
What the world wants is no suffering. Let me into the kingdom of God without suffering. Let me in there with my accumulated wealth and riches. Let me in there to rule with my bombs. Please don’t ask me to suffer as a Christian. Once it was a shame to be a Christian now it is something to be proud of.
Molly Jennings had a secret. She was a closet erotic writer. Her work had been published and no one knows that she is an author as it is under a different name. Molly now has no choice but to move back home as her life got much more difficult with her ex boyfriend. But moving back to Tumble Creek would be a great thing as her life fantasy will be in front of her.
And, she fed me, bathed me, changed my diaper, clothed me
I have read it nearly every year since and whilst travelling the World at 24 with my then boyfriend, now husband I would dash into every secondhand book shop I passed to buy a copy of the book.
BLOG HOP ALERT! Graphic 45 and Spellbinders are CROSS-HOPPING this weekend... starting TODAY! Be sure to check out all the fun and prize opportunities!!!
1/4 C-ish honey or agave syrup 1/2 tsp vanilla
So I didn’t just recently make this, but it is a recipe I use quite a bit and when I mean quite a bit I mean every weekend or every other when I was a senior in college since me and my running buddy Jessica craved it all the time.
Yep, this has been quit a journey and it’s not over yet. God is still opening doors, pushing here and there to mold me and filling me up with His joy as I move forward in Him.
You can go back to your regularly scheduled normal January 4th activities.
This the first of these:
The Sweet Sunday Stampers have amazing sketch samples to show you today, so stop on by to see:
below small knobs of dried, dun
I fell to the floor.
I originally intended to follow these two photographs with the full images they were cropped from so that you would see the wider picture. But I don't think I will. Let us leave everything else to the imagination. Shoes are so often an afterthought; an appendage of little consequence. Let this be their day in the spotlight, their brief moment of fame, their walk in the sun.
Well now...
I did get a lot accomplished, but I still have a lot more to do. By the time I called it a night, my back ached, my legs were feeling it, and my hands and arms were tired. I marveled at what was in my garbage can...three hours of work and a whole lot of weeds...
"However, those who fail to integrate into "the British way of life" by
Okay, okay, put your hands down and retract your tongues if you have a strong reaction to the title of this post. Take a deep breath . . . in with the peach, out with the green. There you go. Let me explain.
I am feeling fine today but still persist the memory of the species of man, on whom I showed my sympathy.
Have a wonderful Tuesday!!
The comments that were made were about what the people saying them want for me, not at all about what I want for myself.
Are you truly living your life? What do you think?
In the fascinating TED talk at the bottom of this post, Frans de Waal shares some videos of behavioral tests on primates and other mammals that suggest that morality is not unique to us humans.
and smelling the fires that are stoked
Love for our families and friends is one of the things we, as scrappers, love to show in our pages. Why don't you show me some of that love by participating in the Designer Elements Challenge at Digitals that I am hosting this month. I created a special little freebie for you to use in your layout and there are other freebies around that coordinate with it, namely on my facebook fan page and in my current newsletter exclusive gift when you sign up in the right column of my blog.
That depends on whether I answer for fiction or nonfiction. I’ve been writing in some form or fashion since I was a kid—I always wanted to write, and I always knew I would write in some way. I went to college in another state, about 500 miles away from home, but I came home for the first two summers and tried to get part-time jobs to make a few bucks. The first journalistic articles I was paid to write were for a local sports magazine called Tiger Rag. I wrote an article about the Louisiana State University cheer leading squad, which had just won a national championship. During my interview with the coach, I met the young man who had just been selected to dress in costume and play the LSU tiger mascot at the next fall’s football games. He was a wonderful, charming person, and he was tragically killed just a couple of weeks later in a car accident, before he ever got to play Mike the Tiger. It was terribly sad and made a big impression on me.
Once I got on the H2, I drove as quickly as I could without completely ignoring the speed limit.
I used the Butterfly Trio die set to make the card front placing three different pieces of the Damask Shimmer Cardstock behind. This design is very versatile and can be used with so many of the A Muse Studio dies.
I should probably start by introducing myself: I'm Rhys, and I'm a 15 year old book lover and blogger. Being one of the few male, teenage bloggers puts me in the position of being the target audience of many a YA/middlegrade writer, and through my blog I am able to express my opinions in the hope that someone will find my thoughts interesting and useful- not least authors whose work I critique.
slurs of rhythmic devotion
Now where are we at?
(Antiquities, Book 18, 63-64.)
MSO9.DLL is a core file included in Microsoft Office installation. The file plays a vital role in functioning of Microsoft Office applications including Microsoft Excel. If the file goes missing or gets damaged that might introduce corruption errors in workbooks. However, to guild wars 2 gold solve the existing issue, you might opt for reinstalling Office. The damaged workbooks in this way should be restored from backup. If no valid backup exists, you should repair your file by using powerful Excel Recovery tools.
Almerindo Ojeda — Professor of Linguistics
The Little Man wants one thing, and (almost) one thing only for Christmas. He has been talking about it non-stop since he saw one at his friend's house, and when he got the chance to meet Santa last week he wanted to make sure he was on the nice list.
Here is where I want to be honest: in the past, I thought racism was simply not a thing. That is wasn’t around anymore. That we had solved the problem many years ago. Now, the light is slowly dawning that things are not right. In fact, something is horribly wrong.
Incidentally, the correct format for the riddle is "Why is a raven like a writing desk?”, not "How is a raven like a writing desk?" contrary to any misprints you may have seen.
Intellectual Memela says “when blacks are self-aware, love and embrace blackness in their own terms, it does not mean that blacks are anti-white” (emphasis mine). The opening phrase is an adverb of time. So when does this self-awareness occur? It also suggests that some (again an unidentified quantity) blacks have not reached this marvellous level. Are those blacks who have not reached this “Maslovian” level inauthentic? Are they perhaps half-authentic, like a half-baked loaf of bread? Surely the (again, literate, non-abecedarian) reader can see this is clearly all, in the figurative sense of the word, half-baked thinking, if not quarter-baked and indigestible. And yet Thought Leader allows this kind of writing to be published, a phenomenon I wish to come to later, including the title, Thought Leader.
So out I went and it filled my heart with joy to see her cheering for me as I completed each lap. I had her walk with me for a little to cool down after and as we walked hand in hand she told me she had already planned her Cami kindness act for the next day (today.) She was planning to get up early and make breakfast in bed for Sabrina since she had her state testing today. I told her to wake me up when she did it and I would do the same for Annie who also had testing today.
Guthrie: I see
Do you see how Jaidee’s culture affects his actions and motivations? What would happen, say, if we changed only one of those dimensions. Let’s say that Jaidee’s Individualism scale is off the charts. Suddenly his actions become less about protecting Thailand and more about preserving himself and his way of life. This Jaidee would be more focussed on the personal glory he achieves as The Tiger than on the difference he’s making for his community. This Jaidee would be less likely to willingly take the hit when his fall from grace is nigh.
One life, one life, one life
Happy National Truffle Day, everybody! If you’ve been craving something sweet and delicious all week, now is the perfect excuse to indulge. In honor of the day, here’s a little truffle trivia for you:
If my calculations are correct — and this is so surprising that I need to check it against some published source, which will take time — then we have ample room to spend, not just if there is a crisis, but also to build infrastructure that we need.
In Mr Ramsajan’s words “No doubt in my mind, she knows, when he’s done with me, who is next and also the only Mala left alive”.
carved they are
So my awesome husband took over.
Also calling illegal downloading "piracy" is doing it the same favour that pirates have always received: it implies an unearned veneer of something buccaneering or obliquely admirable about the form of theft to which the term is applied.
Accessories: 1/16 Dimensionals, Kaiser Pearls
When I sat down again, I decided that I wanted to use some of the pre-made templates- where the background and embellishments are already on the page, so I opened an album with 5 pre-mades and got busy adding pictures. I discovered that you could remove elements that you did not want, as well as copy and paste embellishments that are already on the page, or even add embellishments from the easy to navigate side bar.
What does a door have to do with this?
My apologies to anyone on our Christmas card list - you're seeing our holiday cards a bit early. But, each one is unique so you still won't know which is yours 'till they are all done and in your mail box.
1 long-standing
Originally used by the author, Charles Williams, the phrase means “choosing to appreciate what we have instead of being dissatisfied with the grace and other gifts God gives us” (Grant p. 11).
Marion Cotillard, Nine
MUST HAVE:
You may wonder why some of my blogs are about my jewelry. Well, frankly, retirement (sort of) has not been easy. I ran a good size Advertising agency for nearly 30 years in California and learning to slow down and find things I enjoy doing has been difficult for this former single mom and business owner.
Mr Farnham's scout hut (First Lilliput Sea Scouts in Poole) is at the end of a potholed ridden lane/bridle-way.
It is expected, when you are gay
stripped you of wisdom, life and strength,
I did feel guilty because most writers say that writing on paper made them feel more connected to their work. I also read an article that said that writing on paper involved more brain cells than writing on the computer, so writing on paper exercised your brain better. I wanted to go back to paper, but I couldn’t. Paper just didn’t hold my interest anymore.
Except…. my husband didn’t get a job when we moved here. He kept telling me he would, but he didn’t. I was home-schooling our daughters so I wasn’t working. And I kept believing him that he would get a job. He spent his time hanging out with his dad. Then he got a part time job mowing at a golf course for a few months. After that, it was part time at Wal-Mart. Finally, he went to a trade show with his dad and bought a piece of equipment to start his own business. He spent several thousand dollars on this equipment, but he didn’t talk with me first about buying it. And even after he bought it, he didn’t tell me he bought it until a couple of days later. Then he spent several more months modifying the piece of equipment with his dad.
The process I used to produce this piece wasn't simple. The original image of this character was only 3 1/4 x 2 1/2 inches. I didn't have a computer back then, much less a scanner, so in order to enlarge the picture I had to use graph paper. I had to redraw the image increasing its size by double.
When looking at the attributes that are needed for staying on top there has been a lot of research done in the business world and a new book will be looking at some of these. While all leaders need confidence and conviction, both of which Clegg has a lot of, these do not continue to carry you once at the top. So if there are any lessons for political leaders what would they be for Nick Clegg?
Be sure to stop by tomorrow for our Valentine card to you!
But seriously, I just don't give a fuck. I've managed to start drinking beer, getting to know the Knoxious clan again, and watching sports...oh and drinking beer. Mmmmmm...beer. Nothing like watching basketball and drinking beer in the afternoon on a Saturday afternoon. Thanks, I-love-beer dude!
I have $2 to my name and I am grateful for that. I am grateful that I don't have more, I would even be grateful with less. I say this because two things are true when it comes to Jermaine: first, he knows how to manipulate me and, second, taking care of him quells the anxiety that builds inside me when he is working his best to manipulate me.
Little did she know what was waiting for us!
But there is one last gift I want to give back to myself: the ability and desire to write again. Throughout everything I have kept pen to paper, or rather, fingers to keyboard, but everything I’ve produced has been dark, gloomy and morbidly introspective. I start off with clear, good intentions but inevitably end with a clouded slurry of self-pity and fear. There’s no fun in it. I don’t like that about myself. I know it’s part of who I am, that’s why I’ve kept the glut of melancholy boo-hooing instead of consigning it to the recycle bin, but that doesn’t mean I’m ready for everybody else to know that’s who I am. So far I’ve managed to build a smokescreen of strength and bravery I’ve been far from feeling, it’s gotten me through the last 14 months and I’m now reluctant to let it go. I’ve carefully cultivated a persona that is flippant and indomitable, like one of those shrubs that has been shaped like a peacock or a kangaroo, I have trimmed and pruned away the bits of myself that aren’t aesthetically pleasing, to myself or others. But refashioning yourself takes time, and once you start you have to keep going, snipping here, tweaking there, otherwise it all grows back into an unruly wilderness of confusion and shadow. Sometimes it can be exhilarating, but mostly it’s exhausting.
Any chance you'll share your recipes?
The examples Jesus used are nautical ones that still apply today like red sky at night sailors delight and red sky at morn sailors take warn.Another Wind from the west fishing the best wind from the east fishing the least.
so folks, it's time to get into the game. go to twitter.com and sign up for an account, then go to twitter.com/Jenn_McCreath and 'follow' me!
My name is Lana and would like to celebrate this season by giving away a Sassy Apron. I've been creating sassy aprons for 5 years now and I've loved every moment of it. I started my business on a whim, with a big love of sewing and a whimsical imagination and I ended up dreaming aprons. :)
Kraft cardstock by The American Paper Co.
in blinks his bearings borne away!
2. Any race tee, less than a marathon distance, shouldn’t be worn to an ultramarathon event. This goes double for the wearing of sprint-tri shirts to Ironman and Half-Ironman events. It simply doesn’t represent a high enough "cool factor " and sends a red flag regarding your rookiness. It's like taking a knife to a gunfight. It's probably best just to wear a generic name-brand athletic shirt, and go hide in a corner until race time.
And finally the sheer quantity of Rod's entries has won him a prize. But I particularly liked these two:
★ 12月25日 Meet the whole chaos group in Shinjuku & go to Jishuban Club (13:00)
Onion Seeds (Kalonji) Powder : 1 tsp
If there is a move by Hollande to bring an end to the idea of austerity and instead look to economic growth through government spending it would most likely put a fatal wedge into the France-Germany alliance that had existed between Sarkozy and Merkel.
- We only post FULL ALBUM streams on the blog. (or EP with at least 5 tracks)
Good luck! No warranty is either express or implied, and any damage you do to your template is your own dang fault!
Yes, that’s right, not a samba descendant bone in my body, yet, can’t stand still! Food: the menu is a smattering of comfort food – Bolinhos de Bacalhau (codfish balls), Bife Acebolado (sauteed sirloin steak with onions) served sizzling, and Feijoada are some of the most popular calls. Tho the Bife has a good chunk of fatty on it, which I suppose is the point. And the Feijoada is a potion short of magical. Oddly its the Vegetariano and Salada de Camarao (shrimp salad) that I’ve been polarizing towards. And the collard greens throughout are so crisp and tasty, I had to include it in the photos attached. All this talk of salads and vegetarian dishes probably has Mac wondering who’s writing this blog!
Not to seem ungrateful to all of you who have sent me birthday wishes but I feel compelled to correct you. Today is my “found” day. You see I was not born but instead my family unit found me under a rock many many years ago. No really go read about it here. I'll wait. http://gladysspeaks.blogspot.com/2009/01/found-under-rock.html
They dream of home.
We can’t proceed with business as usual.
NZUSA would be the first to complain if the government didn’t invest enough in teaching and research.
Anyways, I have really felt God pushing me to think of the real reasons I have gained so much weight. There is no magic pill. I need to pray and seek Gods help in helping me to let go of all the shame, guilt & issues I have. I have to actually give it all to Him. That right there is a big weight I carry around that is SO unneccesary.
This is the point that both criminal cases in the lower Courts missed – they made much of the offensive nature of the Tweets (or that they were threatening) but missed the point completely on the public funding and public nature.
3. My memory
Singin’, this’ll be the day that I die.
- Qualcomm = $2B/year licensing CDMA patents (89% margins)
When we defend ourselves, we stop God from defending us. It has to be one way or the other. It cannot be both ways. When we turn the other cheek to our enemies, we are loosing the power of God on our behalf. Let God defend you today.
There is a really good article in Metropolis Magazine by Nicholas Coldicott telling the story of "how Japan's least fashionable drink came back from the grave": the whisky highball.
Green Flash Double Stout
From menu planning/shopping system, you might think I’m a control freak. Well, that would be partially true, but I also love getting to the market and finding out that something new is available. If I’ve planned my menu right (see below), I may be able to add something unexpected into our menu. Or maybe it becomes a lunch snack. I can also make a note of it and work it in next week. The point is, don’t make yourself so controlled that you miss the beauty of the market.
This wonderful article if by one of Spigot's talented contributors, Allison Greco. I caught up with Allison to find out what's going on in her life. Here's what she had to say...
Once I assembled those materials, it was time to make the cover. I chose a black background since it matched the background of the asteroid image. I centered the image on the page (roughly speaking) and then applied the text for the title and my name above and below the image. Finally, I used a starburst effect in Gimp to add the... well, the starburst... in the upper-left corner.
This park element will truly be a boon to the Columbia Waterfront and the nascent Greenway. Take this opportunity to provide your input and learn more about one of Brooklyn's finest open space innovators, the Brooklyn Greenway Initiative. Be sure to check out the Briefing Book (pdf warning!) for the site. From BGI:
If you are considering downtown venues for your reception, put The Center on your list to visit.
The morning rain clouds up my window
1. Even if I dont know where I’m gonna go
The actual shots taken of the con are high quality and look appealing. However, Spurlock makes Comic-Con look just a little too nice. Now, of course we want to show Comic-Con in a good light, but Spurlock should know better than to misrepresent the true atmosphere of a major convention such as this. As any regular convention-goer will tell you, pop culture cons mean waiting in ridiculously long lines, dealing with huge crowds and as Kevin Smith points out at the end of the film – major stink. I, myself have never been to a ‘stinky’ con, but when I’ve talked to people that have, they never forget to put an emphasis on stink and sweat. Spurlock’s version of Comic-Con is just a tad bit more light-hearted than the real thing. At Morgan Spurlock’s Comic-Con, the atmosphere is nice, clean and spacious. The San Diego sun is bright, and sugar coats the path to the convention. It’ a wonderful place where geeks can come together to be themselves, and discuss what it’s like to still live in their parents’ basement. Ladies and gentlemen, I give you – Morgan Spurlock’ Comic-Con…Hmm, that sounds like a wonderful tourism video. I wonder how much Comic-Con paid Spurlock to make it.
I also like what Albert Einstein says here about embracing the mysteries of life.
deal,asking the agency to recorver the amount from AfroMedia ,the
These handmade gifts mean so much to me. It makes me feel so special that someone would spend the time to make these beautiful things for us. I truly appreciate all of the time and effort that went into each of these items, and they will be treasured for years to come.
I used the Flower Frenzy set to make this card. I love all of the flowers in the set and I had fun making them in different colors and layering and crinkling them up to add dimension.
I would own lavish dresses, made by fancy people.
I attended two coven rituals over this past weekend in honor of the season, serving as clergy in the second… They were both large and fantastic displays… and as all wonderful rituals inevitably are, both were very tiring. My feet have been killing me. Of course, as typically stubborn as I am, I didn’t let that stop me.
And everyone acted like they didn’t notice, and didn’t see, the hurt that I couldn’t help but see. I’d had enough of that. Enough of that social game, where people lie to each other, and pretend that everything’s OK. She’d told me half a million times about how she wasn’t going to give in to self-pity, and throw a pity party. And while that’s commendable, and I agree with that completely, that doesn’t mean you ignore that you are hurt. And, damn-it. That’s what she was doing. And that’s what everyone else was doing too.
2 cups old fashioned oats
While it may seem silly to travel all the way to D.C. to go to a zoo, it really is worth it. Not only is it a great value (free) but it is probably just the change of pace your family needs if you’ve done a lot of museums and monuments!
Or is that why she is hot?
Premarital condition tests can detect inherent diseases that can be genetically inherited to the child, such as albino. For example, the husband bringing nature of an albino but his wife does not, then the child born does not become an albino. Conversely, if his wife also brought an albino character, then the child must albino.Jika meet with couples who are equally brought this nature, marriage is not to be stopped. It’s just that need to be agreed to have kids or not. If you still want to have kids, so the risk the child will be albino. Or pick not to have kids. Marriage should not be delayed by obstacles such as this. What is important is the clarification or prevention.
74.733132 , -94.932071
As I look upon saddened eyes
6. LIGHT HYBRID BEER
* We ask design team members to vote on submitted layouts for each challenge
But only true friends will leave footprints in your heart.
He was later awarded the Distinguished Service Medal for bravery but continued to feel pain in his groin.
don’t bet on my daughter to be first on Mars.
But who is this Sinterklaas/Santa Claus/Saint Nicholas character anyway? Right. So Nicholas was a pretty ordinary boy from a third-century southern Turkish fishing family. Unfortunately, that’s about as much historical info as we seem to have, because the rest of his life story digresses into nonsense about miracle-working, for which he became known as Nicholas the Wonderworker. One of his miracles was to resurrect three boys whose remains were being sold as pickled ham by a mentally unhinged butcher.
And then there’s Bidmead. The arch-rationalist. Or, if the heresy may be permitted, the truest spiritual successor to David Whitaker to date. Let us remember that Bidmead’s belief was that the show had strayed too far from its original mandate of teaching science to kids. But who was in charge for that original mandate? Whose view of the program was Bidmead actually returning to? Clarke’s Law and Whitaker’s Heresy are already, by their nature, indistinguishable. One can never quite tell which is in play. But by simultaneously embracing the development of a new visual grammar for television and a drive towards real science Bidmead conflated the two more completely than anyone on the series had to date. He is the ultimate Whitakerian heretic.
And, no, it's not on ITunes (yet, although I did find another old favorite on there last night--American Woman by the Butthole Surfers), and frankly the whole MP3 downloading thing makes me a little nervous.
While the Crossoverse incorporates information from all four of these settings, it is a unique multiversal continuity. Do not assume that just because a person, place, thing, or event exists in one of the base franchises that it will exist in the Crossoverse.
After having been deceived in Libya where the US assured both Russia and China that it will not attack but did quite contrary to what was promised. Sensing that US plans to attack Syria, Russia and China were quick to veto the American resolution in the security council that infuriated the US Ambassador Susan Rice who left the session in rage.
Sharing is something that should come natural in a very competitive world.
The constant emotional abuse with various situations drives me further away from trusting you with my heart. More than fifteen years ago, I divorced you. I emancipated myself because I knew that something about our relationship was off and the judge agreed. I want a healthy relationship. I want to be able to spend time with you without talking about how I need to do something that satisfies you.
What does Sunkyeol mean, and why did you choose the name?
The woman’s aunt said that her niece had been in and out of a psychiatric ward and that a hospital called several months ago to check up on her. She also said that her niece didn’t mean to do it because she was not in her right mind.
Later, we gave it a spider, two Japanese beetles and an ant. The praying mantis ate one beetle and the spider caught the other one. Then the mantis ate the spider. We just put a baby cricket in and now it's eating it. It has a big appetite.
Biff: "I finished waxing the car, Mr. McFly!"
Well guess what - your day will come. Replace that holier-than-thou attitude with one of compassion. The last thing that mom needs is a condescending look from someone who, based on a brief glimpse, has judged her as incompetent. Give that frazzled mom a look that doesn't condemn her, but affirms that she's not alone. A look that says - I understand; I'm sorry you're having a tough time; it's ok.
“They don’t call him anything else?” Looking over the rim of her glass as she watched Emily eat, Tara’s inquisitive eyes studied the little girl. Emily shook her head no, her mouth filled with pancake so she couldn’t answer back. “What does your mommy call him?”
But I also cast some of that handspun on for projects, and…well…
“We know that the law is spiritual; but I am unspiritual, sold as a slave to sin. I do not understand what I do. For what I want to do I do not do, but what I hate I do. And if I do what I do not want to do, I agree that the law is good. As it is, it is no longer I myself who do it, but it is sin living in me. I know that nothing good lives in me, that is, in my sinful nature. For I have the desire to do what is good, but I cannot carry it out. For what I do is not the good I want to do; no, the evil I do not want to do—this I keep on doing. Now if I do what I do not want to do, it is no longer I who do it, but it is sin living in me that does it. So I find this law at work: When I want to do good, evil is right there with me. For in my inner being I delight in God’s law; but I see another law at work in the members of my body, waging war against the law of my mind and making me a prisoner of the law of sin at work within my members. What a wretched man I am! Who will rescue me from this body of death? Thanks be to God—through Jesus Christ our Lord!”
So this earnings season, dig deeper into the numbers. Yes, look at their sales. And of course, look at their earnings. But take a look at their profit margins as well. Are they going up or down? In other words, are they making more on each dollar of sales they make, or less? This is important stuff to know, and could make the difference between investors buying a company’s earnings announcement, or selling it.
So I ask you…is a 2011 maroon Impala too much to ask? See, not all the rich are ostentatious. I think Alice and I would really get along.
Regular news and current updates will resume tomorrow. Sub Radar passed 500 posts and 500K pageviews almost simultaneously today. I really don't even know what to say, aside from thanking you for joining me in my musical adventures over the past year.
I will always love you.
1-23 Bossier City, LA CenturyTel Center
Amanda Goodwin
Overall, yes, I'd recommend these.
Coincidentally, that week, I also received the results to my first semester exams at where I am currently studying – The Manipal University, Dubai. Now, since I am never too old for them, good grades still make my parents very proud; and daddy being a firm believer in rewarding “hard work” decided that the two of us must celebrate. Celebrate a.k.a an occasion to splurge on a delectable lunch at Zuma! If you didn’t know or guess already, the word splurge should give you the hint that eating at Zuma is for when you are feeling rather generous.
Where, for starters, are the laws of quantum mechanics themselves supposed to have come from? Krauss is more or less upfront, as it turns out, about not having a clue about that. He acknowledges (albeit in a parenthesis, and just a few pages before the end of the book) that every­thing he has been talking about simply takes the basic principles of quantum mechanics for granted. “I have no idea if this notion can be usefully dispensed with,” he writes, “or at least I don’t know of any productive work in this regard.” And what if he did know of some productive work in that regard? What if he were in a position to announce, for instance, that the truth of the quantum-mechanical laws can be traced back to the fact that the world has some other, deeper property X? Wouldn’t we still be in a position to ask why X rather than Y? And is there a last such question? Is there some point at which the possibility of asking any further such questions somehow definitively comes to an end? How would that work? What would that be like?
A: Will this assumption ever die? I'm not saying every self-pubbed writer will sell as well as I do. But there are many writers selling just as well, or better, and many of them never had a print deal. I'm sure my backlist helps. I'm also sure a backlist isn't needed to succeed.
As a kid who had grown up in the hardcore/metal scene around Chicago, rap sounded new and exciting but also a bit daunting. I didn’t dig Easy E’s solo album like some of my other friends, black and white, did. I didn’t know as much about the scene at the time. If I knew the entire history of an obscure hardcore act like the Cro-Mags, I knew very little about Public Enemy, except what the media reported, which we all know frequently proved inaccurate. The Beasties knew about these things, and they provided a style and aesthetic that gave kids like me a way in without feeling like some kind of interloper. What followed? I worshiped Tupac, Biggie, Wu-Tang, Public Enemy, Run DMC, and the list goes on. The Beasties gave me a key, I only had to use it.
but still…)
A few days ago, F.H. Buckley, a professor at the George Mason School of Law (and McGill law graduate and former professor) published in the National Post an op-ed arguing that the Canadian constitutional system, and in particular its lack of separation of powers, serves us rather well by helping maintain a free economy and a fiscally prudent government, especially compared to “America’s second-rate constitutional system.” His colleague, Ilya Somin, has a reply at The Volokh Conspiracy, arguing that those economic outcomes would, on average, be more secure in a “separation of powers system” like that of the United States. I am skeptical of both claims.
Recognized as one of the world’s top yoga teachers, Aadil Palkhivala began studying yoga at the age of seven with B.K.S. Iyengar and was introduced to Sri Aurobindo’s yoga three years later. He received the Advanced Yoga Teacher’s Certificate at the age of 22 and is the founder-director of internationally renowned Yoga Centers in Bellevue, Washington. Aadil is also a federally certified Naturopath, a certifiedAyurvedic Health Science Practitioner, a clinical hypnotherapist, a certified Shiatsu and Swedish bodywork therapist, a lawyer, and an internationally sponsored public speaker on the mind-body-energy connection.
So congrats to one of Oregon's youngest breweries and one if its most engaging and accomplished brewers, Jamie Floyd--that was a helluva beer.
Quickly my journey grinds to naught with a tailback from Collingham to Seacroft and a cackling old man – this is driving nails into my palms – as a 40 minute trip now doubles.
Dialogue with the Examiner on Difficult Biotech Cases
2 pm Sunday
Mr. Zhao went on to state that "without regard to their fiduciary interests, the debtors are promulgating a construct to siphon the overwhelming portion of the estates' remaining cash to pay their own professionals."
Now, I said there would be a giveaway because I am celebrating three years of blogging fun and also, my birthday. I have a kit for this pincushion and if you leave me your name and e-mail link, someone will be a lucky winner of that kit. You'll also get the supplies needed to make the matching needlecase. That tutorial will be posted tomorrow. Come back then because there will be an additional giveaway, plus another one on Saturday and a special one on Sunday!! Have a great day everyone!
I also enjoy that last action scene in NYC. There is one particular shot that is uber-impressive, starting from Iron Man helping Black Widow while she was on that alien rider, camera panning to feature the other Avengers in action one by one in one long uninterrupted shot.
So I've done several technology trainings over the past few years. I get really passionate and pumped up during these summer trainings. I can see the excitement for the teachers that come and every year I thing...this is it...this is going to be the year that we see some new things happen. Then the school year begins and the kids flow in and the lesson plans are due and the testing starts and .... well you know.
Like when was the last time someone was actually fined for allowing their dog to poo on the pavement? It’s ridiculous. You virtually have to catch the dog in the act, then collar it to read the rego tag because – being a wanton lawbreaker – it’s hardly going to tell you its real name and address.
I also enjoyed the honest exploration of what may go through a man’s head when tied to a chair, and there were some good one liners in there, for example “John would watch with a combination of humor and anticipation, just waiting for that Kodak moment.” I also loved the juxtaposition at the start, it begins with the suggestion that everything is normal, but then Cargill snaps the reader back, and we realize that it is not in fact an ordinary day, and that this man is in a life threatening situation.
Interestingly, the last time North Carolina amended their constitution on marriage (in 1875), it was to outlaw interracial marriages. The fundies have never apologized for that one, either. (I am sure a majority of fundamentalists still quietly agree with that position, but they have learned it isn't polite to say it out loud.)
You have baby stuff around your home. Because you never imagined you wouldn’t need it.
But what kind of literature is FB? In terms of subject and interest it is as wide as the world of books and letters, as wide as the world of any human contact. In its means and manners it is more informal, generally briefer and snappier than the letter. It is not an essay but a series of remarks that can be honed to a delightful or at least honourable precision. It can address politics and make jokes. It can share music, films, and other interests.
Today is all about a sinful potato salad that when you sit down at the dinner table, you better have your shoes on 'cause folks, this one is so good, it will knock your socks off. Creamy, it's like biting into a deviled egg stuffed potato. Whoa, now that's an idea for a whole 'nother recipe.
The leader of the siege was former national secretary of the Nation of Islam, Hamaas Khaalis. Khaalis, born Ernest McGee in Indiana, had a beef with the Nation of Islam and, in 1958, set up “a rival orthodox Islamic organization, the “Hanafi Movement.”
It was at my house, and I had gone back to my bedroom for a "rest" after what was probably a lively mixture of substances, and when I returned, there was Leif Garret in my living room.
Mr. Romney said that he gets his information about what women want from his wife who tells him that women are worried about the economy and about the lack of jobs and all things happening with Wall Street at the core. Maybe that’s because the women than Ms. Romney talks to are the ones whose husbands earn their money off of Wall Street investments. Ask these women what’s most important to them and I’d have little evidence to contradict the contention that market indicators are important to these hardworking, dignified women who passed on the really hard work of raising children.
Every once in a while, the kids would cast me a sympathy glance.
Freckles- Darker- My Ugly Dorothy
To steal a line from a film geared to the female demographic (I can almost hear The Man saying this in his generic female voice), I weep. I'm a weeper. Can you guess which movie star uttered those words? Okay, I'll give you a hint... he's English, he screwed his kids' nanny and starred with Robert Downey Jr. Yep. You guessed it - it's Jude Law.
The KING of the WORLD … better yet Universe, is riding on a donkey. Begotten, not made. On a donkey. Not only that, but this was the first true acknowledgement of Jesus’s king-ness, and possibly Christ-ness that we know about.
What’s in your wallet?
12.Jumpin' In The Numbers
put it) it was hoped that “the salubrity of the sea air may, during the long
When we are able3 to build
O, For a thousand tongues to sing
Sid Dickens Memory Blocks make wonderful gifts, and are best viewed in groupings on a wall. Memory Blocks can be found at Fire Opal Brookline or online at fire-opal.com.
I also realised that the dream I’d been having was quite strange (I was selling jewellery on a stall at my old school, but all the customers were really gobby and kept telling me how rude I was. Strange. Though not as strange as waking up yesterday morning and the first thing Rob saying to me being “takes it up the Dusseldorf”. He then explained this opening gambit had been a product of me talking to him about Germany. Which I hadn’t. He does have very vivid dreams, that boy.)
Well, to be honest, it kind of is my duty. Last year some time, I was reading the book of Genesis - you know the part where Eve gives Adam the fruit from the tree of knowledge of good and evil and he takes it and eats it - and it dawned on me that wives are the gatekeepers of the home in regards to what our husbands eat. So, it is up to me to make sure that Drew has eaten a banana or some broccoli, or fish, or whatever. Funny that when he eats junk food, that has nothing to do with me - it's all him.
Contestant : Naomi Campbell
"Excuse me," I said, like a proper Person of Target.
But, the cost of operating specific units varies widely. The most important cost driver comes from the cost of hiring and maintaining security staff, and the actual architecture of prisons creates staffing differences. In general, prisons built around the turn of the century (1880's-1920's) were built of stone, and have blind corners, nooks and crannies, and lack centralized cell-block pods which allow surveillance of living spaces from a central guard station, etc. A second cost driver arises from specialized services such as extensive medical, psychiatric or other treatment services. The second set of cost drivers is difficult to analyze from the outside because the agency does not report these costs separately from security costs. That said, some units cost $21+ per day/per inmate more to operate than the state's average operations costs.
Eyes - small heart in white, standard hole punch in black
One day, after a concert, a fan named Bill Magee approached Fiona and handed her a letter. The letter was about his school’s gay-straight alliance and asked Fiona if she would mind replying with a sentence or two of encouragement or support of the group.
Amen."
Upending the adage that it is better to give than to receive, I was fortunate to have received in order to give! Thanks to fellow food bloggers who shared favorite holiday recipes, I found sweet little ways to hold some big gift wishes for us all this Christmas.
Some say that an active intercourse life is going to help any man to become more self assured and make sure his self worth is actually good – whether that is true or not will probably be something that each man will have to decide for themselves or not. That can be mentioned for his or her memory and their emotional health also because a person’s overall well being can be determined with how active he’s and that does imply in each which department.
Today’s Stories
Conditions can pull you down
Wink and I walked down the road towards the sea. There's not exactly a beach.
I have some books to give to you.
Describe the images you recall, write down memorable lines and reminisce about the time in your life when you watched or became aware of this movie. Then begin to write your poem.
I can’t help being genuine. Telling a lie or half truth is nearly imposible for me. I think about karma and weigh the question “Won’t karma come around and correct my behavior if it is inauthentic?”
This could be a perfect opportunity for magazine editors to see that plussize models can appeal to a broad public. You càn make stylish, tastefull fashionstory'. Preferably so without a big title that they do use curvy or plussize models.
“I had never studied the neighborhood in depth before,” Morrone said of Fort Greene/Clinton Hill. “I studied the architecture, but not what actually went on inside those walls. As I began looking a little more deeply, I found this dazzling variety of Brooklyn people, some of whom aren’t that well known anymore.”
1989 was not a lucky year for the Brazilian, losing certain victories in USA, Canada and Italy due to mechanical problems, whilst he was taken out in Portugal by the already disqualified Mansell. Once again Suzuka would be the deciding factor in the championship battle, this time with Prost the favourite. Senna had to win to stand any chance of taking the fight to Adelaide. He lost the lead with a poor start and harassed Prost all afternoon, with little chance of getting ahead. On lap 47, he closed up and made his move into the final chicane. Prost, knowing that Senna had to win turned into the corner and the accident was inevitable. The two McLaren cars interlocked wheels and slid to a halt. Prost unbuckled his belts and walked away but Senna kept his engine running and restarted. However he needed outside assistance from the marshals to get going again. Despite needing to pit for a new nosecone, catching and overtaking the Benetton of Alessandro Nannini, Senna won and was promptly disqualified for the outside assistance offence. Prost was champion. Ayrton was furious, threatening to walkaway from the sport he loved, believing that a conspiracy had been set-up against him by Prost and the unpopular FISA president, Jean-Marie Balestre. More allegations and accusations followed and Senna’s super license was revoked.
Let us show our appreciation for Winner today by offering up inspiration and thought-provoking questions that came to us through her writing in Still.
By its very nature balletic in style this cue offers a break from the bombast of a lot of film music today. I try not to think of this as musical accompaniment for the ice skaters Torvill and Dean or (for some reason) I would perhaps take a dislike to it.
Also, even if you asked me in person for a recommendation, I would still like you to fill out the request form.
Perhaps this time for another age
Psalm 32: 1-2 says: Blessed is the one whose transgressions are forgiven, whose sins are covered. Blessed is the one whose sins the LORD does not count against them and in whose spirit is no deceit.
Once again thanks to everyone who has sent in pictures or posted a comment to let me know they're using my patterns. It's always wonderful to see the unique touches that everyone adds to their creations!
This album is not something that is going to play on the radio every few minutes and that’s a sign of times. In today’s hip hop radio world content has to be dumbed down, beats need to be catchy, and hooks need to be simple to remember. Lushlife is a true throwback to way things used to be and need to go back to. I felt that each track was unique, including a sample of Kool Moe Dee getting ready to battle and beat MC Busy Bee in the 1 st major, and still talked about hip hop battle. Just another tip of the snapback to the older generation. “Progress” was a standout track that featured no lyrics from Lush, just a progressive melody and a speech on humanity. This artist said a lot without saying a word, a harken back to DJs in the early 1980′s that were stars of a show without saying a word.
It’s a short set, but one that is quite, quite beautiful.
Pop into the oven, 475-500 degrees F for 15 minutes or until the dough is springy firm and very lightly golden. The hot berries might have burst abit by now.
I focus now on paperwork and the exorbitant out-of-pocket costs for Alzheimer's care, while I adjust to living a life that doesn't rotate around tending to Mom. I have been amazed to discover how much of my time, energy, and money have gone into taking care of her, but I'll save that for a different post.
Macarons are little, round cakes made primarily of ground almonds, egg whites and sugar that manage this pitch-perfect balance of slightly crispy on the outside and soft and cakey in the middle. At Ladurée, they come in flavors that are dreamt up in a “laboratory”: lily of the valley, black currant, violet, licorice… and of course there are the classics like chocolate, vanilla and raspberry.
This third person might be called common sense and we often forget about it in the battle for reality, truth and right passions. It is the mediator or awareness or maybe the philosopher who sees both sides and shrugs his shoulders.
Don't be jealous, but we just got an Indoor Pool. It was a quick and easy installation; we put it right between the Sculpture Garden and our Personal Gym. We hardly even noticed it was there until construction was complete and it was ready for us to wade right in.*
Bugatti came out with a few videos that signature the car and place it at the very top of our Wish List. So don’t forget to tell Santa about your number one present, while you’re sitting on his lap in the mall!
Last night my mom and I were talking and she said something about making beef stroganauff for dinner. I was trying to figure out what to make for dinner too, and really needed to start something soon if dinner was going to be on the table at a decent hour. Luckily I had some chicken breasts thawed out, but no inspiration for them. When Mom said she was going to make beef stroganauff, that got my wheels turning. I wondered how the sauce we use would taste on chicken. So I used the stroganauff flavors of sour cream, dill and paprika as a launching point for this dinner. And since all four family members wanted seconds, I say it was a hit.
It sounded as though Kirsty was a bit sick of her black separates as so many women are and sometimes you just have to ring the changes, so I decided to include some navy into her wardrobe as it is often a far more flattering colour to wear. I am loving orange this season and it looks great with a tan as well as the tan accessories I have chosen to complete her looks. I have included some gold costume jewellery as Kirsty struggles with accessorising her outfits, I decided to stick with gold tones as they work well with orange and are easy to wear until she gains more confidence. I have also included a lightweight summer scarf, a great way to bring her looks together. When faced with a capsule wardrobe challenge I always try to choose everything from a department store to cut delivery costs, so all the clothes featured are available from John Lewis who stock a large range of brands as well as their own quality collections and offer free standard delivery if you spend over £30.
So, today I stopped talking and got to work. The Fitness Test is broken down into 8 steps (with my scores next to them):
Any questions about this, just ask!
Embellishments: Flowers, Charms, Brads and Thread all from my stash
Highway 101 stretches through the Olympic Forest for miles. Winding between moss ridden trees, massive Spruce and Cedar, and along many beautiful river and streams colored by 3 Olympic Mountain Glaceirs. It is an experience unlike any other. Majestic rainforests and far open spaces. However, this was not what I was seeking. I needed the ocean.
This should result in at least 5-10 signed contracts.
Tracks Listing
Their visit and talk left a big impression on me. Here were people who had gone through the same things as we had. But there’s a big difference – they were respectable members of society while we were inmates of an institution. The one variable that had decided our lot in life at that time was… they no longer took drugs; they worked on their rehabilitation.
This is heartbreaking, but it is, after all, just a movie. Even so, I think this part of the movie taps into a spiritual truth. It reveals the struggle of faith that we have sometimes as Christians. Our Lover – Jesus – has been gone for a long time now. All around us, voices tell us to give up, to move on, to settle for life as best as we can get it. But if we do that, we find, like Kelly, that when Jesus returns, we have no room for him in our lives anymore.
Rimmel London Soft Kohl Kajal Eye Liner Pencil in Pure White
Then came that miraculous day when I said, “This is a sh…” and heard our son, diagnosed with nonverbal autism, say “shoe.” Everything within me jumped! I laughed, wept and shouted. I hugged him and thanked God over and over.
Marcie
I guess to a 12 year old girl, seeing men who don’t fit into the conventional understandings of what her generation considers ‘hot,’ poses one of those eternal conundrums of youth. So I tried t explain to her that back in the day Seal had a stunning physique. She looked at me with serious concern for my sanity radiating from her eyes.
On paper Sheffield Wednesday have a nice fixture, they are at home to already relegated Wycombe who have nothing to play for, however knowing Wycombe as I do as I have followed them closely they are a proud bunch and will fight tooth and nail to end their campaign on a high.
When we met he said he had a request.
When should a school contact, or assist a parent in contacting, law enforcement officials?
Vicki B. Wrap
As a reader who’s been with Jeanette Winterson through thick and thin (and there was enough of the latter to make me wonder if the thick, viewed from a distance, was thin too), I was disappointed to hear that she was publishing a memoir. Didn’t she say “There’s no such thing as autobiography, there’s only art and lies”? That was the refrain from her 1994 novel Art & Lies, one of the thinnish moments I’m nonetheless very fond of (“my most closed piece of work … written at a time when I was looking inwards not outwards”). But there needn’t be any contradiction here: the most interesting kind of memoir – from Nabokov to Burnside – is that where the author acknowledges both the limitations of memory and the creative aspect of the process of writing the life. In the foreword to This Boy’s Life, expert liar and memoirist Tobias Wolff says that “I have been corrected on some points, mostly of chronology. Also my mother thinks that a dog I describe as ugly was actually quite handsome. I’ve allowed some of these points to stand, because this is a book of memory, and memory has its own story to tell.” Or as Winterson puts it here, the ending you need is not normally available unless you write it yourself. “Reading yourself as a fiction as well as a fact is the only way to keep the narrative open.”
½ lemon, peeled
And when that is put aside, my own creative side becomes the focus. I finished all that work on all those images--only to decide to shake it all up. So I'm working on another large set and seeing what pics fall where--in the "top" file, or in the "reserved" file.
“Big arrangers may find this worrying as it becomes their responsibility to prove that they are not liable.”
These came from my friend Denise, she has great stuff she shares!
But … through much contemplation, I realized that it wasn’t just him leaving that caused the glum response; rather, it is what his departure represented – change.
Jimmy Sommers
So…although I’ll admit to the occasional head-shaking as to how NOW got here so quickly and stealthily, I can’t complain about life at 35 one tiny little bit.
7. Do you keep track of how many visitors you have?
» 9/15 – Toronto, ON @ Air Canada Centre
Darius Klein – American University of Cairo, Egypt
It was true and it was wonderful.
For the West African nation of Mali, which was plunged into political crisis after army officers seized power in a coup two weeks ago, he said “may the glorious Christ grant peace and stability”.
I shot this Iceberg through the gut. Entrance from the Atlantic Ocean into, Quidi Vidi Village, St. John's, Newfoundland & Labrador. There is a girl silhouetted in the front. I used her as a scale. Also, the seagulls standing topside. Enjoy this, Earth Day!!
My crib and dresser were oak, and the hope chest was a pine color. The only thing that I had done was bought the bedding, and the little changing table pad. My friends transformed this into my favorite room in the house. I am one lucky girl!! I'm sure I could get much better pictures when it's light out, but I can't wait. I love you all! Thank you for making me feel so loved! It almost made me forget that the lady at the Rec Center asked me if I was "overdue". And to all of you who read this, well "MY FRIENDS ARE WAY COOLER THAN YOUR FRIENDS!!"
Science: guinea pig for my "soon"-to-be-published science curriculum
I made a few small, dainty crowns and a few goofy, larger ones.
The iced whipping cream whips up the whole smoothie to a creamy fluffy texture, just like eating a very light soft serve ice cream.
that will take that weapon out of the government’s hands.
What she wants you doing right now is working those pre season tasks hard. That is your job right now. It's blinkers time. Focus on those goals. Focus on those excuses. Focus on the fun tasks coming.
Turn Your face to the mountains,
Though Brodsky said he still hadn’t made up his mind about the legitimacy of the Yankees’ request for additional tax-exempt bonds—under what the Internal Revenue Service describes as a “loophole”--he did offer this statement at the end of the three-hour hearing: “I dislike public benefits for private parties when the public at large is being starved in so many ways.” And if that’s a description of sports facility finance, he added, “so be it.”
-Kari
I know, I know. I’m letting everybody down. Especially myself.
Seriously, how do things just disappear one day? You better spill once I find you.
My friends are like the acrobats.
Lifespan: It's free! Doesn't matter!
Edgar H. Emery, 45, Clifton, N.J.
As the US beefs up its military presence in the Persian Gulf region, Pentagon strategists estimate that they would need less than a month to defeat Iranian forces should a military conflict take place.
Most gluten free bread is sold frozen. At best is is dense, and tastes funny. After moving to Austin, I went to the Whole Foods downtown for some lunch and shopping. The Whole Foods in Austin is HUGE. It is like a small city with several restaurants and lots of prepared foods. Anyway, we were in the bakery section, and I decided to ask someone stocking the baked goods if they had any gluten free bread. She pointed to a display where there were two kinds, white (potato flour) and whole grain (didn't notice, was too distracted by the white bread). I picked up the bread and it was SOFT! I teared up and yelled "OMG it's soft!" to my friend. I couldn't quite squeezing it and saying "it's so soft!" the whole time we were in the checkout. As soon as I got home, I opened the bag and ate a slice. It was amazing!
Who did the underground bases, in your estimation? Who nuked them and why? Does it have any relationship with this meeting in Monaco?
All you have to do is leave a comment on this post saying which 2 items you would pick if you were to win. A winner will be picked at random after the giveaway has closed.
My baby is turning three tomorrow. I can't believe it. The time has flown by, yet it feels like ages ago that I held that little, calm bundle in my arms. Having him sick reminds me that I won't get to hold him like this much longer. He is already so long!
The Fourth Board of Appeal dismissed Loufrani's appeal. In its view the goods in respect of which protection was claimed were common consumer goods, the relevant public was the general public of the Community and , considering that what were involved included ‘items of jewellery, leatherware, clothing and the like’, the relevant public would pay a relatively high degree of attention when choosing those goods. However, the marks was a very simple and ordinary design with an exclusively decorative function, which would not be perceived by the relevant public as a distinctive sign. Loufrani's successor in title, The Smiley Company, appealed further to the Court of First Instance, which this morning dismissed its appeal.
So, after a middle school track meet today, where some of this stuff will be right in my face, I will, once again, head west. Just the thought of being alone in the sandstone and the sun helps me breathe a little bit better – I can only imagine how good it will feel to actually be there.
Most of the party guest at the Winter ONEderland party will little munchkins and I needed an age appropriate party favor.
This is a big weekend for me and I’m trying to focus on being more prepared for the Temple…I think if there’s any week and any reason to start changing my attitude on my family and stop being so harsh, it’s this week and for the reason that I want to be a representative of the Savior’s love. I want to see how he sees and hear how he hears. Judge not by the sight of my eyes or reprove after the hearing of my ears. It’s time to change because the Temple and the covenants I’m making deserve it (if not require it).
In church we are going through the book of Colossians. The passage from today was Colossians 3:12-17. Our pastor focused quite a bit on the verses that have to do with thankfulness and gratitude. I need to be thankful. I want to have a heart of gratitude and thankfulness - to look at Jesus and be nothing but grateful for all he has done for me. Be thankful in all situations - if Christ is your life, then gratitude should be your lifestyle.
Note the plural in the sub-heading: BNP is able to show agility on the war crimes trial issue because SQC is nothing more than a regional leader, none of the party’s central leaders can be credibly accused of war crimes, its founder was an iconic freedom fighter, and it can still boast of many freedom fighters in its leadership. The trouble for BNP is that it’s slated future leader Tarique Rahman has a lot of potential charges pending against him. How and when the government charges him for arms smuggling or assassinations, and how the party responds to the accusations, will play important role in years to come.
Use a lightweight, well-draining potting soil for container gardening. Pre-packaged soil can be purchased at a local garden store. Most soil varieties will work for container gardening; however, it is important to stay away from clay soils and soils made of primarily peat. Clay holds too much moisture when watered and can prevent your plants from getting the air they need. Contrastingly, problems can alsoarise if using a peat soil since it is too lightweight and has difficulties retaining moisture.
had held and hungry still, I went down
Keep His praise continually on your lips.
“You know,” Bernie was saying as they trudged through snowdrifts towards the Guild Hall, “I guess I like you after all, kid, so I got to tell you… If I were you, I’d be laying real low around town, if you know what I mean.”
For the accommodation of the guests the new residence was thrown open to the roof, whilst in the old residence, which adjoined, the orchestra was stationed which provided music for those who desired to indulge in the pleasure of dancing.
I thought that this would be a new step but seems like all other kind of inventions in the it world. At the end it is only with hte purpose of money as usual. The amount of money for big companies or even small companies is important at this time.
This is our compost in mid winter. This time the compost in use is on the right (with potatoes growing out the top) and the newer material is on the left.
The Bata Shoe Museum hosted a preview of God Save My Shoes, a documentary film about women's passionate and often obsessive relationship with shoes. The film features top shoe designers Christian Louboutin, Manolo Blahink, and Bruno Frisoni, as well as women shoe lovers/collectors from New York, Los Angeles, Paris and Milan, including Dita von Teese and Fergie. Experts, including Dr. Valerie Steele, Director and Curator of the FIT Museum, and Elizabeth Semmelhack, Senior Curator of the Bata Shoe Museum, give thought-provoking interviews on women's obsession with high heel shoes.
pants: anthro
The new competition will be launched by the Doctor himself on Blue Peter on CBBC, Thursday 12th January at 5.45pm. The challenge is simple. School children aged 9-11 should write a mini-episode that features the Doctor in an Olympic-themed adventure. Amy and Rory can be included in the script alongside one of four familiar alien species plus a brand new human character.
What do you think??? Why not have a go yourself??? Great way to have instant greetings cards at your fingertips - all your own work in print!!
Bargaining.
So here we suddenly find her in the car with the hospice sister. A broad Afrikaans woman, compassionate, capable, delightful and remarkable in her ability to affect a life. Offering her relief from pain and other medical processes. She shines, she radiates.
Farfalle (bow-tie pasta)
The ANC was completely unskilled and inexperienced in any form of management, let alone government. Yet everyone cheered them, because they seemed so nice, so likeable. Their bragging, "sophisticated" appearance and their pretentious quasi-intelligence bluffed the ignorant masses into believing they are capable and in control.
Stir in cranberries and water.
Now close your eyes
Here, we face a description of only the circuit’s function, not of how it operates with other circuits or devices to carry out that function. Moreover, even assuming we had a description of the circuit’s operation, "for interactively introducing aesthetically desired alterations into said appearance signals to produce modified appearance signals," ’919 patent, col. 15, ll. 38-41, we were shown no evidence from which to conclude that this description identifies the circuit components or conveys the arrangement of circuit components to one skilled in the art so that he could draw the circuit’s elements and their sequence.
1 chiang
Sounds of laughter shades of live are ringing through my open ears
Grapes
They dry to a beautiful texture that goes beautifully with a nice cheddar.
Winner: Julie Bowen, Modern Family
I first saw Greg when he came through the door of the hotel. Being a hotel in the Red Light district of Amsterdam, the door was only opened when the buzzer was pressed. In the few seconds it took for someone to get to the counter from the door I had to decide if I would give them a room or not. This migth seem harsh but we got all sorts through there. It wasn’t uncommon for people to try to scam the cigarette machine, to hold up the receptionist, or use the rooms for sex. It was not that sort of hotel and I, as receptionist, had to make sure it didn’t become one. I took my role as Guardian Of All That Is Good very seriously.
“You must be the change you wish to see in the world.”
If you'd like to run a meeting/topic discussion, please contact Nate or Dave via email or at the meeting.
Keane apparently tried to take a photograph of an officer's name badge and he allegedly pushed her, after which she apparently slapped him.
In 1796 Shrewsbury entrepreneurs Thomas and Benjamin Benyon joined forces with John Marshall of Leeds who purchased the rights to the newly invented flax-spinning machine. Ditherington Flax Mill was built near the canal. Because the woollen industry in Shrewsbury was declining there were plenty of skilled workers looking for work, excellent transport links with the canal and roads and a market for it’s products such as carpet weaving in Kidderminster and Bridgnorth.
And I use the word "reincarnating" very deliberately rather than "resurrecting". So, has anyone done this?
DD sees this kind of thing as hopelessly romantic and holds true to her much darker visions. Well, except in the case of the inspired lunacy that is Robert Rankin's world . Sadly, in terms of the real world, I think her dystopias might be much nearer the mark.
I fear I’ve lost my soul, says Oliver. Oh Joseph, I’ve lost the manuscript—all of it. The whole thousand and one pages.
The weather in London was on the cool side and very windy. On the upside, there was none of the forecasted rain and it was still light outside when I reached my flat and headed out. Spring is here people!
So the question is — is this the signature architecture we want to leave behind? What does this building say about our community? Does it live up to the Downtown Plan? Is it massively inspiring? Will you drive by and point it out as a fine example of the greatness of our city? Is this the best we can do?
Snip.
Hilda’s curls flailed wildly around her shoulders. She’d been wearing her blue robe and training hood for days; it was a relief to uncover her head. Tossing her training garb aside, Hilda flung herself into her rocking chair. Behind closed eyes she saw again the last human she’d tried to help to earn her Fairy Godmother license. “Oooohh, boo!” How did her gifts always manage to go wrong? She couldn’t understand it. That spell for magically growing rope had been one of her first and easiest at the academy. Hilda couldn’t imagine how it had become attached to that poor girl’s head instead of her window. She sighed. If only she’d performed the spell less perfectly it might still have been of use. She could have cut her magically rope-strong hair and climbed down it, but no – it had stopped growing and disappeared as soon as it left her head, just like the most obedient elf rope in the land. “How could it have landed on her head?” she moaned, half angry and half desperate. That poor girl, with her hair now ridiculously long, had been her second chance at her license. If she didn’t manage something better soon, she’d have to give up and leave in disgrace. Hilda did not think she’d make a good disgraced fairy: she didn’t have the grace or the temperament to accept help from men instead.
Such reductions would be devastating for the poor nations of the world that need fossil fuels for their development. It would please only the rich politicians and film stars from the West and the privileged activists from Greenpeace and the WWF, who will come flying in on jet aircraft to Durban prepared to sacrifice science and our precious planet for their green ideology, which has become the superstition of the day.
Tyger! Tyger! burning bright
We believe in America. We believe in ourselves. Our greatest days are still ahead. We are, after all, Americans!
David Barton
06 LOVE KILLS (Freddie Mercury) 6'31
There was also the AU project of bringing together African leaders on the continent and those in the diaspora, a project close to Mbeki’s heart. Nothing should be done to affect negatively this legacy, which no one could take away from Mbeki.
We'll be chatting with the hashtag #BECOME so join us for your chance to mix and mingle and win!
10 Frogs not leaping
stars for sand, space for water.
Kurt Cobain looks at me and winks -
at the front of the room.
Dear Trader,
I don't care what anyone says about Christmas. I love buying my kids presents. I don't care if anyone thinks I'm shallow! I try to be careful about what I buy though, I want it to be useful. I'm almost done shopping, but I still have to wrap! Yuck! I hate wrapping presents!
The image on the label is to honour the Mayan Day of The Dead (kinda like our Halloween); this is the closest we'll come to a Autumn Seasonal Beer this year.
The only other thing that has been going on this summer, is I've become a consultant for Thirty-One Gifts. They have some of the prettiest bags I've ever seen, and I LOVE bags. If anyone is interested in any, please let me know or you can look me up as a consultant on the website. Look under my name, Melissa Cahill. I'd be happy to answer any questions or help you with them. They're having a special until the end of August...15% off of everything in the new catalog.
The point being, life never turns out the way you planned it. I wish I could give you a bullet point list to illustrate my reasoning, but my mind is a body of water that strains bridges and dams. If you’re as spiritual as I like to believe I am then hopefully you’ve realized that God has one hell of a sick and twisted sense of humor. My remedial understanding of blessings is that the lord will always deliver, but never on your time, and it’s never the exact package you asked for. You want Malibu Barbie? The Lord brings you Hawaiian Fun Skipper. Well gee thanks, God. Hawaiian Fun Skipper is cool and all, but I wanted the pink convertible and you gave me a pink scooter. There’s some deeper meaning in this, right? Some lesson I will come to realize ten years from now that’ll make me go: Ooooooh...well now I've gotta get on my knees and pray.
I spent about 2 hours there just soaking up the culture, the music, the sun, the company, the view. The Spaniards that were there were proud of me. They told me so. haha. I adjust well.
With a balanced throat chakra we “… tune into our own inner voice; it picks up our intuition and our spirit guides and angels.” This helps us tell the difference between our “ego” thoughts and our true messages and beliefs that come from within. Pg 143 Our intuition is not “an audible voice” but a subtle message. To increase your intuitive powers you will first need to be open to being an intuitive person. The second decision is to expect to be intuitive. “Expectation acts as a magnet for intuitive feelings.” 145/146. The third decision is to trust the feelings that you are opening to “because your intuitive feelings may not be supported by appearances or confirmed by others.” Pg 146 The fourth decision is “…to act on your intuition when it guides you.” “Making these four basic decisions – to be open, to expect, to trust, and to act on intuitive feelings, will create a direct conduit for your fifth chakra to communicate messages to you…” pg 146
A little peace and time to reflect.
Statistics released last week show that Turkey’s economy grew more than 9% in the 4th quarter of 2010, outstripping expectations and underlining, says Erdogan, that Turkey’s “economic dynamism” is a one-off in the Europe/Asia Minor region. But many think the ambitious Erdogan is in a hurry to gain full (and irreversible) control before the out-of-control boom ends up in a very hard landing.
Add 3-5 cups more flour a little at a time, until desired consistency is reached. You want a soft dough, not sticky. Knead for 8-10 minutes by hand or 5 by mixer.
Furtive fingers; respectable beggars
I had an appointment during lunch. As I was on the elevator after my appointment, a threesome of very handsome, young lawyers, decked out in expensive suits, boarded the elevator a few floors down. I smiled and they smiled back. One of them kept checking me out. Seriously, he gave me the up and down. I so knew he thought I was cute. Even as we were headed out the revolving glass door he turned around to look at me again. I have it, what can I say.
Individuals with specific interest on lavish and custom houses can begin their hunt for luxury homes for sale in Ormond Beach. These lavish houses provide the grandest beachfront views that one can enjoy waking up every morning. In addition, the houses itself are grand and classy so it live up to all sorts of specifications in mind.
It is necessary that your friendly form line is one which your subscribers will recognize. One example is, will not have the CEO within your company sending your email. The reader might not know who it really is from and just delete the email. From the subject line, put your business’s name.
4) You can get an additional entry for each of the following. (Let me know in the comments section what actions you've taken.)
We'll be selling them in packs of ten from next week (hopefully in our new online store - finally!), so watch this space.
There will be particular joy for fathers in reading this book, mainly because there will be several moments of recognition. That isn't to say that mothers won't enjoy it, on the contrary, if you want to understand a little better the mindset of the anxious father, or to understand that his clumsy attempt at intimacy came about not because he's some kind of animal but because even asleep in the back seat of the car with mouth open and nylon seatbelt bisecting those wonderful breasts of yours, you were quite simply a thing of beauty and the only wonder is why contemporary art isn't filled with more breasts bisected by nylon straps ('Where are the songs and poems, the sculpture, the oils on canvas?'). There will doubtless also be moments of joint recognition across the sexual divide.
"We cannot tell if the people reporting, as required by their bail conditions, are meeting those conditions that they were released on."
5. Barnes & Noble- Sorry folks, no free books here but since I got my nook I find I spend a lot more time on this site.
If one needs proof of the soul it's easily found. The spirit is most evident at the point of extreme humiliation.
And they also look a bit like small, furry hippos.
like to find gold, I had thought,
The Independent ran a catch-up piece on Hackgate yesterday, such things being necessary if readers aren’t to miss an important part of the plot that began life as a Glenn The Lonely Pirate. James Hannan’s quietly bitchy article stayed on the safe side of litigation fence: anyone writing about this farrago of misdemeanours knows full well by now how many familiar server addresses crawl all over one’s observations from the Newscorp Crow’s Nest. Nevertheless, it was notable for this memorable paragraph:
when he was born all they asked me was "Would you like to hold him until he passes away"
From the university website it is plain to see what is planned for this newly stripped expanse of mud. By the autumn of 2013 it is planned to contain accommodation for almost 700 students a social pavilion, I’m assuming that is developer jargon for posh common room. This pavilion, christened The Hub, will hold a laundrette and a grab and go retail facility. Now this is where the rumours start to come together. There have been whisperings as berries of information dropped from the grapevine that this new project will play host to the most convenient of convenience stores, a Tesco Express.
Okay, that's all for now!
The Color Purple (Quincy Jones, et al.)
- 1/2 Cantaloupe: Like a lot of fruit, it contains a lot of water. You also get beta-carotene for a small number of calories!
There's a collective sense throughout our team that Comrades have blown their stack. Finally we have the much needed impetus to go on and win the game. During extra-time Paul Andrews plays a useful cameo up front, making himself a focal point in linking up play between midfield and attack. Barnett then repays his manger's faith, threading a thirty yards pass through to Sam Schwodler, who still has his work cut out when running through on goal. He gives the ball a good thump and sees it nestles in Comrades net. The relief is tangible.
4- Get Involved - Ask the Lord to show you how you can be involved. There are many Thembi's that need to hear how Jesus loves them.
I just wrote half a blog post and lost it when I went to download pictures. (Teach me not to save!)
William Merritt Chase, The Bayberry Bush
change and compromise wouldn't be so hard
10. Credit Cards
‘And Mum.’
Ju bëftë mirë!
Grill for 8-10 minutes, turning skewers over and basting the paneer with the oil halfway through cooking. They will be done when paneer turns a golden colour. Sprinkle chat masala on the hot paneer skewers.
Thanks for making a smart remark, Senator. I ask you, could anyone other than a “relatively unsophisticated” group be so stupid to fall for this preposterous FBI entrapment script?
we have had such hot and humid weather for weeks that...
“Man never made any material as resilient as the human spirit.”
To be honest, I am so sad to pick out just 6 people to pass the awards. I really don't want to miss anyone as I absolutely enjoy reading each and every one of your blog! So I am sorry to have missed some of you!
How did India begin is bonhomie with these rich sports? A lot of it has to do with British. How is it that India took Cricket so seriously and left out Rugby and Soccer? One word answer to that question would be ‘Fitness’!!! One look at the list and we can see that apart from Tennis and to some extend F1, none of the above sports demand astute physical fitness. Apart from Tennis, the other sports are played in a handful of countries. In other words, India has done well where there is less competition and requires less physical fitness. India is nowhere near the world’s most popular sports – Soccer, Athletics, Aquatics, Hockey, Basketball, Rugby, Volleyball, etc. Cricket is the only popular sport where we win matches regularly. It is followed and played by a lot of people but very few countries actively play the game.
Mix all the ingredients together in a large pot or slow cooker (I prefer the slow cooker that way I can keep it on low and we can enjoy the hot cider throughout the day). Bring to a boil. (In a slow cooker turn on high and in about an hour should be good and hot). Reduce heat and let simmer.
So take this! (kills DMX) Now I’m gonna go visit your girl
What would you change if you could turn back time?
Let me explain-most friends are like dogs or cats. With dogs, they are loyal, great companions, will do all kinds of stupid stuff with you just because they like hanging around you. However, their attention span is a tad short at times. If you don’t put a certain baseline effort into the relationship the next thing you know there are holes all over your backyard, a hole under the fence, and the dog is out getting into all kinds of other mischief without you.
Twelve men were arrested in 2010 but many of the girls were too scared to give evidence in court or regarded the men as their boyfriends despite the huge age gap. However five bravely agreed to testify against their abusers.
Other times, it’s a shame because sometimes no matter how nicely or gently you put something, a person will still get offended by being told they are doing something undesirable. Or they just may never get it!
Here are a few of the ways in which I've helped mentor others:
Electroshock Therapy:
THE WICKED AND THE JUST is just under six months away from publication. In the debut world, this is the time when things start happening. You order postcards and bookmarks with your cover on them. Bloggers start emailing you, wondering if you’d like to do interviews and guest posts. Maybe your publicist drops you an email to introduce herself.
And she has. Over and over again. Throughout time, Luce and Daniel have found each other, only to be painfully torn apart: Luce dead, Daniel left broken and alone. But perhaps it doesn’t need to be that way. . . .
“When all the people were being baptized, Jesus was baptized too. And as he was praying, heaven was opened and the Holy Spirit descended on him in bodily form like a dove. And a voice came from heaven: ‘You are my Son, whom I love; with you I am well pleased.’”
Yesterday a friend of mine drove me to the hospital to visit my mom. She parked quite a way from the hospital. But do you know what. It was kind of nice to walk for a bit. We chatted along the way. In no time at all we were at our destination.
In old French, I have heard, the tomato was sometimes affectionately called the pomme d'amour - the apple of love. I totally get it.
Why is this? Why is this disease prevalent in Blacks? I will tell you why. It is because the mutation deliberately occurs to eliminate this host body that once had healthy cells. It refuses the idea for that particular host body to have healthy cells. Evolution determined its DNA to have what will carry this particular disease. It is out to kill what it does not favor. Is it because he is Black? It is because that particular disease can destroy this host easier than a non- Black host. For whatever reason evolution uses to do its dirty work. DNA favors no one but evolution does. But evolution uses DNA to determine if the host lives or dies. This is evolution.
Well, that about wraps up 2009. We also continued our annual Christmas tradition of watching a Christmas movie. This year we watched a couple of them, the first was, "It's a Wonderful Life" and the second was "Four Christmases." They were both pretty good.
And there we have it: Alper's theory of fictional reality. You saw it first here.
Nidetch took the food plans back to her apartment complex and organized a small cluster of neighborhood women to support each other in their quest to shed pounds. By 1962, she had lost dozen of pounds and had gained valuable insight into the power of group support to control eating habits. Using the 'prudent diet' as a rough guideline, she moved her regular meetings into a loft above a movie theater in Little Neck, charging $2 per meeting -- the same price as the movie tickets being sold downstairs.
the skies here have been
My 2012 resolution remains the same as last year...live healthier. I'm keeping it for another year not because I didn't accomplish this in 2011 but because I believe being healthy is an ongoing process, there is always something more you can do to live a healthy lifestyle. So keep eating well, keep being active, keep meditating and being positive. I should add, to keep learning. It's a good thing to always stimulate our brains with new stuff. It's good to challenge ourself with a new technique and feel great about it when we master it.
My friend (who I shall herein refer to as “Chad the filthy Cajun”) sent me this link to a video of Saints fans partying in the parking lot of a New Orleans Academy sports store after the big win over the Vikes in the big easy, supposedly to buy NFC championship shirts. It is my belief that they were actually looting the store.
I just want to scream at him and tell them all what a liar he is. Its a struggle to keep my composure as I step up to speak.
Armin Van Buuren (!!!) 5/28
Ross
Today is World Autism Awareness Day. Instead of perpetuating unsubstantiated claims based on junk science, wouldn’t it be more prudent to focus on sorting out the true causes of autism and therapies that can improve the lives of these children and their families? Every Andrew Wakefield, every Jenny McCarthy, every Robert F. Kennedy, Jr. sets the cause back at least ten years.
This year was my golden birthday, 25 on the 25th. It was honestly, the best birthday ever. Loved every second of it. Of course it got off to a great start with a kid free getaway, but then on the actual day it was just as great. I woke up to my two darlings boys after being gone for two days. We picked up lunch and then headed to the park. After a successful trip to the park, I was positive I could get a nice long nap out of these boys, and i did.... three hours! And i slept right along with them! Such a great birthday gift in itself. Who doesn't love a nice long nap?! After we all woke up from our naps we played some more and then we were off to dinner.
Chocolate Chip Cream Scones
Ok, ok – don’t yell at me I’ve got pretty good ears. In fact they’re so good I’ve had them insured. Do you want to know for how much?
As always, supervision is important. For safety, encouragement, and treat replenishing.
Today was awesome, plain and simple. The first eight miles of the mini were freaking amazing. I felt awesome. I hit a hitch afterwards. My IT band HURT. I ended up walking on and off for about a total of a mile between mile nine and eleven and even stopped for a moment at mile 10 for some stretching because my hip hurt so much. The last two miles of the race my hip cooperated with me enough that I ran a comfortable 12:50 pace. My unofficial Garmin time for 13.44 miles was 2:55:44.
This includes full professional interior and cover design
Prayer: You prepare a table before me in the presence of my enemies.
Im going to give pattern reading a go soon, I have allsorts of things Id love to make but I dont want to get too ahead of myself
And lucky for you, I took pictures!
Acts:
Happy St. Patrick's Day!
1/2 red onion, chopped
Raspberry White Chocolate Mousse: 14
"That we die before our time."
Assistant Chief Constable Nigel Yeo said, 'At this stage there is no connection with the arrests madew under the Terrorism Act elsewhere in the country.
ten thousand miles. Quitting was not on my mind.
All the way to town, the young lady went over in her mind the hundreds of things that could happen to all his money. Finally, she couldn’t take it anymore and asked him, “What if the bunkhouse catches on fire and all your money burns up?”
Is it so hard to do?
Allow me to temper that optimism with the fact that SPY still hasn’t reached it’s 1 month (21) EMA yet. This area has proven to be the upper bound of any rally attempt since early May…and that is a decidedly bearish scenario. Right now the average stands less than a point above today’s close, so tomorrow could be a most interesting day. Additionally, I’m still wary of the intraday volatility in this market. When was the last time the market failed to move at least 1% within the course of a single trading session? I prefer to allocate capital to try and capture slow and steady gains. You can make a lot of money in a short amount of time in this market…but you can lose it, and more, just as fast. Therefore, I’d rather just sit back and wait. I know, I know…very exciting.
He said That I will learn new things with my new duties and that he wanna see that (hmm, if you say so).
Once the full darkness had settled upon us, we would run back inside to bring out our collection of old jars. We each had a jar of our own in which we kept a variety of insects. Every night we would collect these critters and fully expected them to live but they almost always died. Oh well, we would catch more. The best thing to catch were the lightning bugs which twinkled around us in the evening. Once we had a jar full, we would begin to be terribly cruel to them, I am afraid to say. We would pinch off the lighted parts and smear the yellow, glowing goop on our arms, wrists and necks to make jewelry which would shine brightly for awhile. Of course the boy cousins were not interested in jewelry, but they would make grotesque mask of glowing war paint upon their faces. Sometimes we would catch chunky june bugs and, begging a spool of thread, we would tie this onto a leg of the bug allowing it to fly around in circles above our heads without escape.
Just think if he had to deliver those pizzas in a 30-minute window? Pretty freakin’ heroic.
I made my Black Bean Brownies into a pie because my square baking pan was otherwise in use (for my cornbread) and all I had left was a round pie pan. Different shape, same deliciousness. And remember, I don't even like chocolate or dessert but I love these!
I almost passed my no spending challenge for the day. Around 1:30 I decided to by a coffee. It was a purchase that was definitely triggered by stretch. See, the reason the office was closing early was because there was a large protest planned for downtown that was expected to have a severe impact on the evening commute. Well, I guess some events earlier in the day got out of hand- people were smashing the windows of banks and other stores just a stones throw from my office. There was a heightened level of tension in the office. I was so distracted by the news that I couldn’t focus on work. My eyes were glued to the news. I didn’t know what to do with myself. I walked into the kitchen at work, really intending on grabbing a cookie. I thought better of it and opted instead to grab a coffee to calm my nerves (sound logic, eh?).
Grill up some sandwiches today!
Built by Nervion River Guggenheim Museum of modern and contemporary art was designed by Canadian-American architect Frank Gehry. The building’s silhouette resembles the ship while the design was random, which helped it, according, to architect catch the light.
You squeeze as much juice as you can out of a few lemons and apply the juice all over dry hair. Then you let it go to work. It will still work even if you don’t go out in the sun, it just speeds up the process a little. I like to add it to my hair when I know I am going to be outside for an extended period of time.
For a little while he had an entertainment agency with an office in Charing Cross Road (central London), but his heart wasn't really in it- nor were his body rhythms - as he didn't enjoy getting up early and being office-bound. I always remember sitting by his office window during school holidays (he overlooked Cambridge Circus, the big crossroads where Charing Cross Road meets Shaftsbury Avenue) and he told me it was very important for me to watch the buses go by and write their number down. It was a good way to keep a little girl quiet, made me feel like I also had a job to do and he would give me a pay packet at the end of each day.
You toured with The Buzzcocks? What kind of reception did you get from their fans?
The United States and Nigeria enjoy a strong economic cooperation and a national security partnership.
Crazy about Lil Justin
Before I tried deep frying at home it was a bit intimidating. I’d had no problem when I used industrial fryers in commercial kitchens, but somehow they seemed far more safe. At home all I could imagine was dropping a batter-laden piece of fish into the bubbly vat of oil only to have it spatter up onto my hands, face, eyes… yikes.
Some of us joke about “The Kiss Principle.” Keep It Simple, Stupid! However that which is truly profound often appears to be so simple that it is easily overlooked. The kind of prayer that opens people up to the work that God may want to do in their hearts about their relationship to money is most effective when it is kept simple. In our campaigns we ask churches, leaders first and then the people, to commit to praying a simple prayer each day: “God, what would you have me do?” Then we watch the church’s spiritual temperature rise as excited people begin to share with each other the answers that have come to them. In every church there are people who end up finding themselves led to a new level of generosity. Those people thank their pastors for the opportunity as they make what is, for some of them, the largest gift they have ever made. Their enthusiasm encourages others, and the campaign reaches its goals.
7) I have changed careers three times.
This study is not about discarding the scientific view of the universe (do that and you lose your readers) but rather about incorporating the scientific view of reality into the (older and larger) magical view of reality.
Tonight Team Xtina and Team Blake performed. The catch? Each coach was going to send one of their members home immediately afterwards. Tomorrow, 2 more will go home. The coaches seemed surprised by this move.
And to restructive of witches stands
We have always been at war with Eastasia. But that's not why I called this meeting.
Location: Wisconsin Rapids to Stevens Point
2124.***E-IV/1/2003. On the significance, if any, of astonishing discrepancies in casualty rates, (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-45.)
I was sorely tempted to keep this new one for that time when I've filled my current one. But, nah! I can't do it, knowing there are some of you out there who have yet to experience the 'R' Pad.
Though delayed, We are now almost ready to host the games. Let’s Come out and play!
Vicky is giving away this amazing collection of Dusty Attic Chipboard to the winner of this workout!
But it aches, each moment a scratch on a surface
But when I want to read at odd times in odd lighting... not to mention carry 20 books around all at the same time (more like 120!)... there is nothing quite like my Nook. And I had a few moments today where I was literally IRRITATED that I couldn't pick up Shatter Me unless I re-arranged everyone on the couch so I could get the lamp, which was more than I could handle...
just for namesake.
april.21: i watched 1.5 seasons of breaking bad and i
Speaking to an ACLU of Montgomery County meeting Wednesday night, County Councilmember Phil Andrews said he believed the “steam has gone out” of efforts to saddle Montgomery County with a youth curfew, and that the proposal would not pass the Council. Andrews pointed to a Tuesday night decision by Montgomery County PTA delegates to vote down a resolution supporting the curfew, the decision by the Silver Spring Citizens Advisory Board not to take a position, second thoughts by some council members, and months of opposition by groups like stopthecurfew.net and the ACLU of Maryland.
Stephen King often uses spiders in his Horror fiction, much to the dismay of Arachnaphobes everywhere! Giant Spiders are also often used in games like Diablo and World of Warcraft. In the Western (and some other cultures’) imagination the spider is therefore often linked to our fears, there is something in that spidery gait, and those black searing eyes that make Spiders monstrous to our Psyche’s. The spider is of course also linked to our own Shadow, that part of us which is hidden and needs to be confronted.While spiders are usually harmless creatures of good luck (and therefore I never kill any on purpose), when they are depicted as gigantic, the fear is all the more tangible as they threaten to paralyse us with our own fears and shadow-self and consume us slowly drinking in our life force and juices. Because of this giant and man-eating spiders have been used in many horror films.
Chloe
Blessed, blessed are those Gursikhs, who, with their ears, listen to the Guru’s Teachings about the Lord. (Guru Granth Sahib, Ang 590)
Oh and in other notes, check out my latest vid of my baby koi. Very proud of them….
our soul
Roland Young Topper
Well said, Mark. While I must admit to feeling a bit of schadenfreude at Nick Nelson’s failure (I had, after all, figured out five years ago, on an impromptu investigation of my own, how his tricks at the Montana Vortex worked), I also feel just a wee bit sad for Mr. Nelson. I get the sense that he probably believes what he says, and that he has believed it for so long that he is going to have a helluva time trying to rationalize away the stone cold fact that his “vortex energy” claims simply don’t work.
I remember where I was; sitting at a round, wooden table opposite my mum’s friend Pat, and flanked by her three kids in a kitchen somewhere in the Devon countryside. She’d borrowed this place I seem to remember on a break from London and I don’t know where she got the eggs, but they came in an unmarked box. They were brown and small and there was a pile of wonky toast, which we slathered in butter. There was also Marmite.
By bigger do you just mean the range was more extensive? For ther record, the Himalayas already push up into the prevailing jet stream, causing vortices further downwind. and alternating highs and lows that we experience here in N. America.
Punch the dough down. Turn onto a floured surface; divide into 36 pieces. Shape each piece into a 6-in. rope. Place 2 in. apart on greased baking sheets. Cover and let rise until doubled, about 25 minutes.
Gmate Product Specification:
The Most Wonderful Time of the Year ... Hallmark Channel ... 12 AM
You learn how to turn their ignorant comment back on the person saying it, which tends to leave them open mouthed and looking like a Trout more than anything.
Indeed, this is a hot favorite literally speaking. You get it served piping hot!
Preheat the oven to 325°F. Line a baking sheet with aluminum foil. Arrange the ribs, meat side down, on a baking sheet. Cover the baking sheet tightly with aluminum foil. Bake them for 1.5 hours. (you can bake them 30 additional minutes if you want fall off the bones tenderness). Remove the foil cover.
On the picture a section of the snake, not because I don't want to show it all, but as this part is so beautifull.
See I don’t believe that anyone is born with that something special and elusive we all call creativity. I used to think so but not anymore. I used to think that either you had it or you didn’t. And if you had it, well lucky you, because it sure wasn’t lucky me.
The next day, Stage 2, we got up early and drove over to Howell Mountain — yes, the same place as last year. Again this year it was raining. Last year we situated ourselves up near the top of the climb, not far from the King of the Mountain sign. This year we decided to stay closer to the bottom and found a sharp hairpin turn. Then the only question was which side of the road to stand on?
After standing there for what seemed like minutes, I noticed that we were standing right across the street from a diner, and I had my answer. "Come with me," I said. I led the man across the street and into the diner, and we sat down at a table for two. I told him to order anything he wanted from the menu. I told him my name, and I asked him his. His name was Henry. I sat with Henry for over an hour, and we talked. He told me his life story. He had been a soldier in Vietnam back in the seventies. Then he worked on the docks in Portland for 30 years until he was laid off. He had tried to find another job, but no one would hire him. Eventually his unemployment ran out, and he lost his apartment when he couldn't afford the rent anymore. He drifted around for awhile, eventually ending up in Concord. He gave up looking for a job "five or six years ago," he said. He said he had lost track of time after the first year or two of living on the streets. He couldn't remember how long it had been since he last had a roof over his head. As Henry spoke, it occurred to me that he was no different from the rest of us. He once had a job, a home, a life. And then one day it all just fell apart. The same thing could happen to any one of us at any time.
I definitely have my work cut out for me this week -- answer my mail!
(I have no idea where to purchase it though, as the on-line store I bought it from is now closed.)
Happy New Year bloggers. I hope you all had a great Christmas and got all the crafting goodies on your wish list.
“Only the Druids are allowed to know the ninth,” he added dryly.
Using the iPad 2 is not only fun but increases your productivity at home. One way to organize your day and manage your tasks is to use HomeRoutines. Home Routines, a daily to-do list, is a favorite iPhone or iPad app among many stay-at-home moms. HomeRoutines will help you manage the repetitive jobs that are part of all our lives, particularly the ones related to housework. HomeRoutines is the app to get control of those recurring tasks, and keep them from cluttering up your email, your calendar, or your big to-do list.
What is really behind its Mask?
That’s Paul as he finished his course with joy. He continued to be a faithful witness to the end. He set the pattern for you and me as we go back to that verse in 2 Timothy 4:8. He said,
Meanwhile, if you side with the likes of ITProPortal, you might believe that “the whole concept of a single lounge-bound gaming device may become obsolete”. The future of gaming may well lie in a more portable device/controller that you can play on the move or plug into your TV. Epic’s Mark Rein has some interesting thoughts on this here.
me: "Yes! (sees sun shining through clouds) You can do things if you work for them."
Both Mayor Satyendra Huja and Szakos agreed with the study’s findings.
Everyone has a scheme of getting rich?.. Which never works.
17 - Ernest Tubb - Walking The Floor Over You - 2:41
My mind was reeling. It still is. I feel responsible. Like in the 8 months I’ve been there I haven’t done enough to impact the energy of our church. The human side of me wants to fix it, because she’s not the first to express this frustration. Then it becomes personal. Am I ill equipped? What has God called me to do, exactly? Is it possible to change our church? Is it possible to change THE Church?
In the end I tossed together the asparagus and some pine nuts
So are you ready? Of course you are! We've all been loving the new images and the fabby papers that are available for this season that we all adore!
My biggest worry from the last few brews is that the mash tun seems to be losing a few more degrees centigrade than it used to over a 90 minute mash. It might be because I've managed to damage the cool box casing, introducing a couple of small holes in it. For now I think I'll just wrap it up more during the mash and see how it goes.
We are now heading for elections, which will be held on September 12th. Our electoral campaign will focus on the need to restore our national sovereignty, because without our sovereignty we cannot defend our identity and fight against Islamization.
Okay! What you do is measure the person you are making for, you will need to know how many inches around the arms will be too so measure that. Give yourself lots of extra room in the length and the sleeves, you don't want a tight snuggle.
Anwaar: See, I told you. We could have been caught.
As his hands returned to the pressure points between my legs, I moaned with pleasure. He gently rubbed my hidden lower lips and slipped his finger deep inside of me—oh, WOW! After massaging multiple spots inside, he slowly pulled his finger out and lightly spanked my derrière repeatedly. I winced with each smack. Not because it was painful, but because it aroused me even more. Each spank caused my derrière to rise off the table.
I'm off to the dentist today, thank you for visiting me I will find some time this week to visit you all
One of the suit’s original plaintiffs was Paula Reid, the Secret Service’s newly-promoted head of South American operations, and the one who blew the whistle on agents’ contact with prostitutes in Colombia. Reid, who is black, gave a statement alleging that black agents were given lesser assignments than their white coworkers. She also told USA Today in 1997 that her supervisors often overlooked her in favor of male agents.
I melted 2 mandrels in the first half hour I worked yesterday, something that never happened in all the years before, my beads get wonky again because the heat is much higher now,the effects with the silver glasses don't work anymore, the flame is totally different *sigh*
Click here to see more rescue horses!
Since Callan was born, we've struggled to keep his feet covered. He pulls of socks, he yanks off shoes. Now that he's quite the able walker, it was time to find just the right pair of shoes to protect his little feet outside and in public - not to mention to keep his feet warm this winter. So, I started researching shoes for baby boys. I know Robeez and Pedipeds are popular, and both come recommended, but I had to do my own research, and find out if there were any other options out there that would suit us.
Tuesday: rest.
Liebster is German and means 'dearest' or 'beloved' but it can also mean 'favorite'. The idea of the Liebster award is to bring attention to blogs with less than 200 followers. So, in the spirit of good fun I am passing this award on to 5 other bloggers.
f. Jeez, are our music sensibilities still colonized by the Brits?
* Colleen Camp as Angela Shan
Oak Park, Michigan:
After a night of Nyquil and a morning of Dayquil, I try a beer that next night. The coughing was UNREAL. My body reacted like beer was made of Affleck spooge. Pure rejection. I don't know if it was the carbonation, the alcohol, the hops, the evil, I could not handle ANY beer. My SPINE was in a lot of pain.
of shredded carrots, olive oil and vinegar, and 4oz of ahi tuna grilled.
So, I avoided the pink on here but that doesn't mean I'm immune. Besides, it matches my face.
Well, you can only re-sole an old pair of shoes so many times before you have to finally break down and buy a new pair. By 1998, the City Council decided it was time to bite the bullet, pull up stakes, and flee the vermin, the cramped, crumbling quarters, and a century-and-a-half of all-around bad juju at Eighth and Colorado, and build a brand-new City Hall worthy of the high-tech city Austin had become.
It's art: hop+opus=hopus
“It was great to finally get my hands on the E20 and I’d like to thank the team again for giving me this opportunity. It’s a fantastic car and I felt confident with it straight away, especially in the dry. It’s a real shame we’ve been limited by the weather today in terms of what we could achieve, but we had known for a few days that rain was forecast so it’s not a big shock. We managed to complete 20 laps in both wet and dry conditions which gives me a good knowledge of the car and will help me be a better asset to the team with this experience.”
Did you catch that?
As I drove up, I noticed a good sign: a gravel parking lot. It always seems that the best barbecue places have gravel parking lots. Furthermore, the building looks exactly like the name of the place implies: a shack. If a restaurant can survive with no parking lot and a run-down exterior, it must mean the food is really good. As I walked up the steps to the front door, the line inside was so long that I had to wait outside for several minutes. Another good sign. Once inside, I noticed immediately the character of the place. There are basically two rooms in Smokey’s. The first looks to be an old porch that was enclosed several years ago, and the second is part of the original building. Making my way through the line in the first room, which is seating, to the second, where to counter for ordering is, one can’t help but read a few of the signs that cover the walls. There are a few ads for hunting clubs, but most are irreverent and somewhat humorous. I could here Kenny Chesney singing “Never wanted nothing more” in the background, and I hoped that would be a good omen.
Shallow Falls is immediately upstream from Suislide Falls. It drops from 15 to 20 feet, and I was able to get a pretty good shot of it with my telephoto lens. I would like to do some bushwhacking around this waterfall as well, but that, too, will have to wait for another time.
It's nice and sturdy, and I like the gold that it brings to the room. It's a good find! All in all, I want to get different chairs for the little breakfast table area, and some curtains. I just feel like the space needs a little bit of funk/crazy/modernity/rustic-ness. It's feeling a little formal right now, which is annoying me, because I'm not a formal kind of girl. I'm really digging Jenny from My Favorite and My Best's style - I love all her moodboards. I need a little bit of her pumped into this room (that sounds weird). Anyway...I'll figure it out! That's part of the fun of designing your own space, and not someone else's...it's ok to get stuck.
Mead's writing is so good I didn't feel overwhelmed or bored at all. It's definitely gripping. I seriously can't wait to read the next books, Frostbite! If you haven't read this already, add it to your TBR immediately.
Thomas Keller, the 2012 S.Pellegrino Lifetime Achievement Award Winner, earned two spots on the list this year with Per Se at No. 6 and The French Laundry at No. 43. Six other restaurants from the United States were also crowned this year: Alinea in Chicago, Illinois; Daniel, Le Bernardin, Momofuku Ssäm Bar and Eleven Madison Park in New York; and Manresa in Los Gatos, California.
Madelyn is so fun and has been such a joy. She's as ornery as an be and keeps us on our toes, but I can't imagine a day without her!
If you haven’t seen this film or read the book do not read any reviews, just watch the film. Warning: this is a long and rambling review.
Mapping signals non-local residence of the Uni-Valmik retat tat
Right off the Pacific Coast Highway lies Ocean Avenue…lined with unique, charming & expensive shops that lead down to the beautiful sea…
Because such a move will strengthen any of the three, especially the Pesaka wing (Dayak)whereby it will strengthen Alfred Jabu’s position as the Deputy Chief Minister, who harbours the ambition of being the next Chief Minister .
or, perhaps you'd prefer to say, "shopping our stash... challenge #50"?! it's a goodie, this week: your brief is to create a mother's day card/project, or a "girlie" feminine design, or heck, why not do BOTH, if you like?!
As I drove by the empty gallery without looking I remembered that Helen is gone. I found out quite by accident. When I googled the name of another artist to do some research the headline of a couple of weeks ago was there. She died on December 27, 2011. Even now there are tears in my eyes writing this.
i had to hold my child so she didn't throw my computer through the window.
The first thing everyone says before they play Stoke City is that they will try to stop them winning throw-ins. Try and fail, apparently, as Stoke won far more throw-ins this season than anyone else. However, from the 980 deliveries from Rory Delap, Ryan Shotton et al, only two resulted in goals, fewer than were scored from throw-ins by Blackburn Rovers, Bolton and Manchester United. Perhaps Stoke aren't taking long enough preparing them any more: this season the ball was in play on average for 60 minutes during a Stoke match – still the lowest in the league but an increase on last season, when their matches only produced 58.52 minutes of actual play.
The urgency of the language in both cases emanates from fear on the most personal level that we as teachers and parents are in danger of literally losing our youth – abandoning them – by not serving them as well as we should; and that we, as a society, on the largest level, are neglecting our mission as adults, forsaking our obligations to the young, chastising ourselves for being unresponsive to what Arendt calls “The New Ones,” the newest generation — new at whatever stage they may be, from pre-school toddlers to college freshmen.
They totally gave us pizza.
GTC class: This class is reserved for vehicles from one-make race series (e.g. Porsche 911 GT3 Cup).
worse, I just think it is healthy if I move on with my life and they
After all, Umno even went to the extent of threatening violence, ‘discovering’ parangs and arresting the EO6 without trial for a month, and clowned around by proclaiming yellow T-Shirts illegal, before Bersih 2.0. All of Umno’s desperate measures only produced even larger crowds last July 9.
There's also going to be a GINORMOUS SALE on TpT in honor of Teacher Appreciation week from May 6th through May 8th, where you'll be able to get some of our products for up to 28% off! So... fill up your wish list now! I AM!! :)
Rising above all that is green,
Rigor? Of course!
Better edge response for touch screens
today during my conversation with Dave my coworker, I learned a lot. The one I’m focusing one at this moment, is the art of conversation. We all know that some people are good conversationalists, and some just are not. Why? We know the basics, they either don’t know how to listen, talk too much, have nothing interesting too say, etc etc.
The elections came and went. Unsurprisingly, nothing ever came of the 150 000 cops. But the illegals came and came.
...so I used it as an opportunity to add a few 'blingy' green glass beads for fun! :)
Seymone on the other hand is one of the girls that didn’t book any shows and she’s actually acting like a 5 year-old. She completely shuts down and sits in a corner and pouts about it the whole time. Honestly, be more annoying.
I've been playing a little more with my twin beads. Once again I started out with a circle of five beads as the shape lends itself well to circular patterns. Looking at the gap between the beads, I thought a bicone would be a good shape to fill it out. So I got out som frosted 4 mm crystals and began stitching. This is the result of my first trial.
Another impressive feature is the design/picture. Not once has it faded which is really nice. I am surprised at the usage of colors and how vivid they are. The meaning behind the Uppercase I choose to review is: “Raising children”. These cases are designed to nurture a positive self-image in kids while using fun and educational graphics to delight the eye and warm the heart. Children will see how treasured they are each time they look at their colorful pillowcases!
Favorite part: When
I was very hurt that my mother never accepted me… but I understand now, that, my mom is still grieving me. I realize now, that this is a form of the highest love… because, she loves so much, she can’t let go.
Liqueur/cordial glasses: Unknown*
Now … I could choose to feel bad or guilty, but I’d rather not. I’d rather feel good about the fact that I learned from my failure, because it’s hard to be the Dalai Lama. But it’s important to keep trying.
"The one thing that's being tamped down here is we're losing characters," Rep. Stephen C. LaTourette (R-Ohio) told the Post. "The place needs character and characters."
Kaitlyn really wanted to have a sleepover for her birthday. I was thinking 8 was still too young, but she has been to one and so have some of her friends, so I told her ok, she could invite 5 friends. Let me tell you, 6 girls make A LOT of noise!!
Original Gravity: 14° Plato
In a bluntly worded report released last year, a media watchdog established by Parliament and led by an A.N.C. member suggested that the media needed greater regulation.
He went on the tram the other day with the neighbor upstairs (Greg, who's a lovely Irish guy that has cute, awkward way of moving and opening his eyes really big when he's trying to make a point) They were speaking in English, and there were some chicks that got into the same tram cart as they did, and one of the girls who sat right across him checked him out and told her friend in Dutch that "The night is getting off to a good start". The funny thing was it happened right after we had a 'fight'. You can just imagine; so you have a fight with your girlfriend and some random cute chick on the tram basically says to your face that your hot. I thought that was funny anyway. And I did think he looked pretty hot that night, fight or no.
I'm sitting here with my foot elevated and a cup of hot tea in hand. There's a gorgeous bruise making its way across the top of my right foot where a shelf came down on it just an hour or so ago. The shelf could have fallen on my head I suppose, but my neighbor J's shoulder kept it from doing that.
“I know many things Pricklewood. Do you believe me when I say I can see into the future – your future, in particular?”
So, agents limit the clause. “Any other book-length work” is too open-ended. We dig in and start defining that book-length work. Now how we define this can vary depending on what the author writes, what they have going at the time, and what they plan to write in the future. If the author already writes in let’s say an adult genre but now we are doing a contract for YA books, we force the publisher to acknowledge their upcoming adult books in this clause as well so it’s clear that even though those books are out on the shelves at the same time, they aren’t “in competition” with the book in this contract.
Apparently this was all the ammunition he needed.
Segway has released its new models, including one that's supposed to be the equivalent of an SUV, with 4-wheel-drive. Someone should tell them things with 4-wheel-drive are supposed to have four wheels. I would have thought that one was kind of a no-brainer. The new models of Segways even come with an alarm, although the spokesperson said Segway thefts are not generally a problem. Imagine that, no one wanting to steal a Segway.
my father-in-law’s last bathrobe.
Cisarik feeds off of the positive organization skills of other people. “I learned to keep myself in the company of people who are balanced in order to stay balanced myself.”
That is quite an achievement, even for a living legend.
The moment I saw it, I was desperate beyond all reason. I HAD to get in that spot. Now. No matter how much I stretched, though, I couldn't bring my 4'11" frame up to that spot. So I grabbed a step stool!
2 chipotle chilis (canned in Adobe sauce) chopped
How about it doesn't really matter anyway.
The other week I made a batch of buttermilk scones that, due to omission of a key ingredient on my part, was an impressive failure (kind of like half baked home made play dough cakes). So I immediately set about making a second batch. They were a satisfying success.
FINAL OVERALL SCORE: A
But in both cases, it comes down to the choices of the teens in question. In neither case are the teen's choices limited by a lack of supplies, options, or information.
and the game is forgotten until someone remembers
Pink Star Gelly Roll pen, Ribbon, Button, Brown baker's twine
I recently received a copy of the book, His Mighty Warrior: A Treasure Map from Your King, by Sheri Rose Shepherd to review. I have been reading it to my kids at night before bed. It's a darling book, but also very inspiring.
Still, while allowing 45.7 million Americans to use their Food Stamp benefits to purchase the kind of foods that can lead to obesity, the Obama Administration uses catastrophic language to describe the "crisis."
“We haven’t got any contract yet, it’s all up in the air at the moment. But we wouldn’t do any major changes, it would only be internal decoration.
... a right mess!!
As it pertains to creation in modern day discussions, ex nihilo highlights the collision of the material and spiritual worlds. The strictly material worldview scoffs at the idea of a world created ex nihilo because it denies the existence of anything that cannot be known via the five senses. But no sooner than a person adopts a strictly materialistic worldview than he becomes cognitively dissonant in the arena of morality. From the materialistic standpoint there is simply no foundation from which to assert any morality. Still, those who approach our beginnings from a strictly materialistic position are no less prone to preaching oughts than the most fervent of the faithful.
Like last week. While talking to a gastroenterologist's appointment nurse on the phone, I asked her where I should report. Upstairs, where my regular doc saw patients? No, I was to go downstairs. "Figures," I said. "In the bowels of the building." Nothing. (Tough audience.) So I apologized, and said she must hear that all the time. Nope. I was the first. See? Sick sense of humor.
Speaking of which, I wouldn’t recommend having your bachelor’s party on a golf course if you at all value your safety. It could be dangerous. There are a handful of angry seniors passing their excessive spare time on the golf course who have absolutely no patience for your unexperienced asses. Come back in fifty years, please.
And once I am out of the situation, do I tell someone? No. I avoid him. I hide.
Jam Going underground UK
There was a defibrillator patch
My dirty little secret that keeps me bound.
FXDD
You think this alarmist, even hysterical? Come with me now on my magic internet carpet to the United States of America.
So...all you have to do to enter in my $25 Starbuck's gift card give away is donate at least $10 to my efforts of raising $2300. It's easy and it's tax deductible! Go here . You never know who's life you might be saving! Maybe someone in your family, although I pray that isn't the case....it could happen. Someone gets diagnosed with breast cancer nearly every 1 1/2 minutes! That's a scary statistic!
Now Ynet talkbacks are moderated. One wonders what the reaction would be if, say, The Guardian published a comment along the lines of "Time to kill Jews."
kind of love.
Tomorrow I get to add some cottage cheese. I didn't know I could sleep this much either. Woke up yesterday at 6:30 am, went in for surgery, and the next thing I knew it was this morning! And today has been very sluggish.
Younger generations, being the trend setters that they are, are quite experimental with their clothes. They often opt for bold colours and prints that are well cut and flattering to their figures, whereas, older generations play it safe with sleek, well-coordinated outfits that accentuate their figures and their poise.
Never fails.
This is a close up of the decoupage, which I cut out by hand. I wasn't so sure at first about cutting out my own decoupage but with a good pair of little scissors, it is fine and the results look stunning!
The court was told Tim Wongsiri, 50, had procured and forced two girls, who were under 15, and her own daughter who was under 13, into having sex with 45-year-old Briton, Stuart Hargreaves Lloyd.
Best Choice if you DO NOT like the chocolate milk overly sweet character:
I used to reprimand my sister for wearing too much blush when she was a teenager and I was an all-knowing kid. Now I understand her affinity with rouge and find myself catching my reflection in the mirror and mistaking it for a circus performer. Funny how things change, but I do agree with her now since a good dusting of a blush on the cheeks does wonders on waking up a sleepy face or giving a healthy glow for a night out. Thanks Nina!
Alright- that's enough of the randoms. What is everyone up to this weekend?
Hope you like it and thanks for stopping by.
Elsewhere, there is a blind man working his way down an alley when he is set upon by a gang of thugs, however, Batman suddenly swoops in, beats the living tar out of the thugs and the starts questioning the blind man, who is one of Batman's informants. The blind man, Mole, explains that the Combine has flown in Jonah Hex to kill Batman and they're also trying to sucker the city council to accepting the Terminator robots as well as getting Batman to relax the firearms restrictions so they can arm the Terminators with lasers.
Of the man and woman we’ve always wanted to be
Welcome to our camp! You can enter through the east courtyard...
Bell Peppers. They are just so beautiful. Peppers are my "go to veggie" (OK, they're technically a fruit) when I need to dress up a salad or throw some color in a dish. And so many colors to choose from! I eat them whole, chopped, sears, grilled, you name it.
We are considered to be in the age of postmodernism, basically the belief from both a sociological and an art critic view is that society has developed so far that it is unlikely that it will ever drastically change again. The world has become easier to access due to the rise of technology and globalisation, that there is nothing new to explore. Humanism has become more popular over the years, rather than believe in a structure to society, it focuses on the individual making intrinsic process but through universal principles. however society in general have abandoned the idea of meta-narratives (such as Marxism) this is evident in the decline of religion. Leotard has suggested that micro-narrative are much more relevant to postmodern society where theories only apply to certain circumstances rather than explain the whole of society.
04:30 – 05:00 Theracords Live
Essential Fatty Acids - Hemp provides the essential fatty acids (EFAs) omega-3 and omega-6 in an ideal 3:1 ratio. Hemp is also one of the few sources of the hard-to-get gamma linolenic acid (GLA), another important source of omega-6 EFAs. All these essential fats are found abundantly in hemp and are great sources of energy. Essential fats found in hemp may reduce food cravings and inflammation and improve circulation.
four 5x5 squares
Julia became the Children's Laureate in June 2011.
Here are the supplies you will be needing:
SKIN SO SOFT Signature Silk Moisturizing Shower Gel, SKIN SO SOFT Signature Silk Gelled Body Oil and SKIN SO SOFT Signature Silk Replenishing Hand Cream
We've Xmas lights, but only a few!
“I see.” Here’s what I came up with:
Alright. I just have to emphasize this: If you had a scandal, it’s alright, for as long as you’re sorry for what you did. However, having an attitude problem is something that you should be ashamed of. I do not respect people who manifest attitude problem. Manifesting that kind of attitude for a celebrity is really the most irritating annoyance. Same when you combine it with cheapness. You won’t be respected if you have an attitude problem and at the same time, cheap.
Roscoe, arrest them Duke boys! What's this? Every jump of the General Lee during the first six seasons of The Dukes of Hazzard? Yes, yes it is. (Compiled by Treva Graham, via John Farrier of Neatorama.)
“Because of corruption, you cannot do business. In effect, you can do nothing if you don’t send gifts to those in power,” Xinhua news agency’s editorial said.
Take it to the Lord in prayer!
Finally, one might ask why the obvious discrepancy between the demagogic media circus coverage of events in Sanford, Florida, in glaring contrast to relative media indifference to the recent murder of an Islamic Iraqi woman in El Cajon, California. Her brutal bludgeoning to death at home by assailant or assailants unknown, was accompanied by the leaving of a note by the perpetrator (s) tagging her as a “terrorist,” and as one who should have “gone home where she came from.” The suicide note is alleged to have contained rhetoric borrowed from recent Zionist and Neo-Conservative political events in southern California drenched in Islamophobia. Where are Wolf Blitzer and Dana Bash? Sean Hannity and Bill O’Reilly? Abraham Foxman of the Anti-Defamation League of B’nai Brith? Morris Dees and the Southern Poverty Law Center? Jesse Jackson, Maxine Waters, and Bobby Rush?
For now I think I'm going to skip the Upper GI and see what happens. Of course if it gets worse I will go for it. I don't even know if our new insurance covers anything band related so I have to check that out too. I also think I'm going to follow my old surgeon to his new hospital. I don't like this new guy, he's a jerk.
Conceive Him then as saying: “Gird yourselves with love towards one another, O My disciples; for ye ought indeed yourselves also to devise and do towards one another, and perform with an eager zeal, those things which I have first accomplished towards you. For I chose you, and it is not you that have chosen Me. I drew you to Myself and made Myself known to those who knew Me not through My exceeding kindness, and I brought you into a steadfast opinion so as to lead you up, that |409 is, to confer on you the ability to reach forward to what is greater, and to bear fruit unto God. Attain therefore to the complete confidence that whatsoever ye shall ask in My name ye shall receive. Since, therefore, ye follow in the track of My words and ministry, and have the mind which My true disciples ought to be endued with, it follows that ye ought not by your own tarrying to throw obstacles in the way of him who of his will seeks the faith and is self-called to a life of piety; but that you should rather attach yourselves as guides to those who are still ignorant and astray, and bring to those who do not yet prefer to learn it the Gospel of salvation, and eagerly exhort them to attain unto the true knowledge of God, even though the mind of your hearers be hardened into disobedience. For thus they would be in your condition, that is, they will advance and will return by gradual growth in what is better to fruit-bearing in God, so as to have the fruit that ever remains and is preserved and that most acceptable object of prayer, the bestowal of whatsoever they wish, if only they ask in My name.“
TANIA HERSHMAN whose forthcoming flash fiction collection has everyone on the edge of their seats in anticipation... She asked me A Question of Place. Where does the writer live - and does that impinge on what she writes?
9. Hope I don't die.
One of my loves is taking a walk in the center of Paris--by the Seine, the grand monuments, the tiny rues with charming shops. It is absolutely breath-taking no matter how many times I've been down the same path. Beauty envelops me. It seeps into my cells and permeates my air. I never fail to realize how lucky I am!
Milo Godzilla $5.50
definitely feeling the love!
So in no particular order we commence..
Maternity Clothes? Almost all maternity stuff with a few exceptions in the shirts and dress department
When all is said and done, who will be the last woman standing at Nigel's side?
Recorded in Hackensack, New jersey, on Oct ober 4, 1955
Instead, though, I spent the time watching the people on the outdoor track, how busy and industrious and happy they looked, like a gaggle of robins, and made out a mongo shopping list.
By now I've left home and am driving into the retirement community I serve, I enjoy the landscape of flowering plants including shades of pink, red and lavender. Dark green shrubs tinged with light yellowish tips are striking as are the emerging green tree leaves and red maples. This day I have only one patient to see, which I follow with a phone call to the patient's spouse confirming I'm ending therapy.
He led us into his new apartment. Much smaller and far less charming than his previous residence. We looked around and followed his sombre figure into the confines.
This recipe is easy to make and it is SPICY!! I cooked it a day before we ate it and that turned out to be a good idea. The spiciness had mellowed and mingled and the taste was richer the following evening.
Public clocks are a common, if treasured, sight in our cities but this example at Bell Yard always looks a little random and surprising to me. Although the bricks form a frame for it, the face appears to have been simply stuck onto the wall.
There was more eliciting in the foreign language lesson (which happened to be Thai) even though none of us had any Thai to elicit. Magically, though, we were all exchanging names and greetings in Thai within minutes and with NO TRANSLATION! Just as geese will mistakenly assume that the first perambulating object they set eyes on, such as a wheelbarrow, is their mother, and will follow it unquestioningly, we were all instantly and irrevocably ‘imprinted’ by the direct method.
Can you see how many problems this can cause for my kids? Yep. A lot!
Well you still enjoy your eating! :) You are very verbal when you get hungry. You go quickly from a happy baby to a mad baby when you are ready to eat. You get yourself so worked up sometimes so quickly that I have to walk around with you to get you to start eating and then sit down once you've started and you're settled. You are an intense eater with gobs of noises! :) You are now stretching your daytime feedings to about three hours a piece. We are just now starting a little "routine" to try to get your feedings closer to predictable times for when your mommy goes back to work. So far this is working well. You dropped your feeding that you wanted around 11 or 12 at night. You were going from 8ish to 5ish without a feeding, but just in the last week or so you have started wanting to eat 2-3 more times during the night. Maybe it's a growth spurt? You are still only breastfed and only take bottles when someone else is watching you. You eat about 8 times a day for about 10 minutes each time.
‘Ye are the first factory that ever was on Papa Stour.’
In a world that is cynical, it is time to come back and focus on the beauty of Jesus Christ. Jesus has all the attributes of God and sentiments of Man combined. Jesus has a firmness that is not overbearing and a kindness that is not weak. Jesus is altogether lovely in every way which you turn Him.
The use of eighteenth-century Scottish dialect made an excellent addition to one’s sense of time and place. Ms. Leslie’s prodigious knowledge of the physical world was matched by her skillful description of it. Editorial errors were infrequent enough to not be a distraction.
To heck with the bad back, I got up and headed toward them, but he ran before I could get there, with her in how pursuit! He must have eluded her because I didnt see him again but she ran the circle of the house at least three times like she was after him but he was not there. He probably got up the stairs before she noticed, thank goodness!
Hello it's Erika from small shop! I was so fortunate to have been able to attend a lovely book party on Wednesday night, in Paloma's place. Guests gathered at the treasure trove RUMMAGE in West Hollywood to celebrate the launch of owner Kishani Perera's book, Vintage Remix. A gorgeous setting and only the most supportive collaborators and fans were there to sip, chat, have a few laughs, and get their very own autographed copy of Ms. Perera's exquisite publication. A recap:
I led an eagle to its nest
The Mount TBR Reading Challenge 2012 is hosted by My Reader’s Block and I’m so excited to do it. The best thing is that it allows crossovers, so I don’t have to feel too bogged down.
I had to clear with the publisher that I would be talking about the series on twitter in advance of publication - in fact, while writing it. There's a sort of non-disclosure clause in the contract. I said I was going to talk about it on twitter and he didn't argue. The publisher is a laid-back sweetie and occasionally joins in the discussion on Facebook and twitter about the progress of #thosevampires (they have their own hashtag). But I would not make the central premise public at this point as that is risking not only my investment in the idea but the publisher's investment - and that's not fair. Plenty of people know that book 2 involves a nasty scene in Paris with a guillotine. But that's hardly enough to recreate the story - I'm sure everyone who reads that can come up with a completely different vampire story that involves a guillotine.
Terriers, on the other hand, is a show whose cancellation leaves me full of regret. Its single season is one of the most perfectly-formed seasons of television I've ever seen, and it quickly became one of the highlights of my TV-watching week. Which makes it a little embarrassing that I have so little to say about it. The show's ardent fans--particularly the writers at the AV Club, who have been lobbying for its renewal and greeted the news of its cancellation with wailing and gnashing of teeth--have expended a lot of effort trying to understand just why a show this good should have so thoroughly failed to find an audience. It's not as if the story, which follows unlicensed private investigators Hank Dolworth (Donal Logue) and Britt Pollack (Michael Raymond-James) as they tramp around the Southern California town of Ocean Beach, solving, and sometimes committing, petty crimes and getting in way over their heads when they stumble upon a shady real estate deal that leaves several people dead, is particularly highbrow, and unlike Rubicon Terriers courts its viewers, dropping them into the action of the season-long mystery in its pilot, interspersing that investigation with well-crafted and engaging standalone stories over the course of the season, and delivering plenty of laughs, most of them rooted in the rapport between Hank and Britt, who are as deeply devoted to yanking each other's chains as they are to looking out for one another.
“Coming from Austin, ‘The Live Music Capital of the World,’ we know a thing or two about how to rock,” says nFusion CEO John Ellett. “More than that, we know how to help restaurant marketers rock the status quo and implement digital programs that engage their guests.”
I thought I would take a moment to share my Valentine's Day mantel decorations. As we moved in, I would throw things up on the mantel as I ran across them. I just kept my eyes open for anything that would work for the season and would add a little red to the mantel.
LESSON 9. Cuttings. Mrs. Tropical Expat got some cuttings of Malaysian basil from a neighbour. She used some rooting hormone, and then put them in a little water and promptly forgot about them. When she remembered them she found the water almost evaporated – but the cuttings had long strong roots as they searched desperately for water. These are still thriving in my garden and the leaves are useful for toppings on salads or homemade pizza. I don’t know if this approach will always work, but perhaps being cavalier this time did.
Pleated at sides for best fit
washing away the salted remnants but a tall cool
When did Life get so tough, and don boxing gloves? Anyway, things are finally starting to get better, and I decided to poke my head out to let any YA followers know they can vote for their favorite book at Children's Choice Book Awards
I ended up laughing though most of it. As did the ladies sitting next to me.
The raspberries went really well with the cake, and the tartness of the fruit cut the richness of the dessert perfectly. I hope everyone enjoyed it at the lunch! Good luck and best wishes to Clayton, with whom I've worked with for over 10 years!
That is not so say that you cannot have fun in Canvey Island. I’m sure you can. There is a fun fair (see photo below) and for pubbing and clubbing, The Monico.
Then there was the HUMONGOUS apartment in a perfect location that tried to jack up the price when we said there would be two people living there. I'm still not sure that we couldn't talk them down, but that still doesn't take away the fact that it has carpet (it gets disgusting in L.A.) and an awkward kitchen that doesn't really accommodate a fridge and has no garbage disposal. It was a cute as hell older place, but with that charm comes a lot of really bizarre quirks... and only two old retired people to call upon when something goes awry. Still grieving.
While you're waiting for the yeast, combine the milk, butter(smart balance), egg, and honey in a separate bowl. Add to yeast mixture and slowly stir in 1 cup whole wheat flour, slowly add the 1 cup bread flour, 1/2 cup at a time.
Of ground, or air, or ought,
Locke opens his eyes and Jack explains to him he just had major surgery, "Try not to move and just relax, okay?"
The Université de Montreal (UdeM), Université de Québec à Montréal (UQAM) and Concordia celebrated the 25th anniversary of their Joint Doctorate in Communication with a special event held recently at the Société des arts technologiques (SAT).
PS- Is that William Topley I see returning to Taos? Haven’t we suffered enough? Hello, Upper Colonias!
Dude. Talk about a one sentence reality check.
On 3 December 2007, it will have been 40 years since the first transplant of a human heart was performed in South Africa. This transplant operation triggered a media response like few other events in the 20th century. Christian Barnard, the lead surgeon, became an internationally celebrated star overnight. A gifted self-promoter, charming and eloquent, he managed to maintain his star status until his death. He found himself welcomed into the circles of the rich and powerful in the entertainment industry, the business world as well as politics.
Emerson: I will help raise your core temperature by using your belly as a pillow.
In Pearl in the Sand, Tessa Afshar creates a conflicted and hardened young woman who finds it impossible to trust any man. Rahab's life as a prostitute has squelched any hopes she's had of ever finding a man who wants her for her and not just her body. Despite her issues with how she sees herself, she has no trouble loving her family (or falling in love later on with her future husband). This contrast makes her character immediately likeable, as well as her keen intelligence and quick-witted dialogue. Salmone wasn't difficult to like either but like his future bride, he has his own issues to work through. What I loved best was that once they found each other, they had to face their own prejudices and fears and their marriage (at first very rocky) helped them both so much. They both came out as better people and fell even more deeply in love.
Thanks for the opportunity to further interrogate the characters in Boy vs.
The group break is moving along nicely - be sure to check back through my archives if you missed any of the posts! However, time is a wastin' so let's crack open two more packs out of the '99 Pacific Paramount box.
I have a CAS Easter card to share with you today. I was hoping to make a bit more of a masculine card. I used the Easter Blossoms set from the Occasions Mini. It is the perfect set to have for Easter and Spring cards!
sense without knowledge,
"Therefore do not worry about tomorrow, for tomorrow will worry about itself. Each day has enough trouble of its own." Matthew 6:34
Thanks for reading! Happy running and have a super week!
Day 3 and 4 of our new beekeeping journey and we were confused. We hoped everything was right and according to the 3 books and the DVD we had purchased all should have been in order, yet something didn’t seem right to us. I mentioned earlier it seemed as if one hive was much stronger than the other…and as each day passed, it seemed stronger. They were consuming their sugar water at a rapid pace compared to the other hive who by Day 3 were barely touching theirs. Then the ants seemed to multiply on the weaker hive and I researched again….finding that sprinkling ground cinnamon around the hive would deter the ants…so this I did.
So we made our way to the entrance and prepared to go into the castle grounds. Now Blarney Castle was built nearly six hundred years ago by one of Ireland’s greatest chieftains, Cormac MacCarthy, and has been attracting attention beyond Munster and Ireland ever since. Over the last few hundred years, millions have flocked to Blarney, making it a world landmark and one of Ireland’s greatest treasures. Now that might have something to do with the Blarney Stone, the legendary Stone of Eloquence, found at the top of the Tower. Legend has it that if you kiss it and you’ll never again be lost for words. I guess it could be responsible for this blog in a way!
Levesque ended the strategy discussion with a larger strategic question. She pointed to the example of Facebook founder Mark Zuckerberg donating $100 million to Newark schools. She then asked the crowd to imagine instead raising $100 million for political races where we “could sway a couple of seats to have more education reform.” “Just shifting a little bit of your focus,” she added, noting that new politicians could have a greater impact.
Charter Road East
For the study where meditation caused changes in the gray matter of the lower brain stem, see: P. Vestergaard-Poulsen, M. van Beek, J. Skewes, C. R. Bjarkam, M. Stubberup, J. Bertelsen, and A. Roepstorff, ‘Long-Term Meditation is Associated with Increased Gray Matter Density in the Brain Stem’, Neuroreport, 2009, 20(2), 170-174. Link to article.
As a young boy, when I would complain about those that made me mad, my Gramma would always reply, “Calvin, just kill ‘em with kindness.” I never understood what she meant.
If not, then what?!?
So . . . because we all have creative moments when the brain conjures up some seriously amazing thoughts and just throws them out there to be either nurtured liked a garden or flicked away like an ant at a picnic, on a sandwich, peeking its mayo-covered head out between the lettuce and tomato right when you're ready to take a bite, I've decided to have a best opening line contest!
Bill Hader played the host, natch. At first, I thought that this was going to be one of those classic SNL sketches that perfectly toes the line between offensive and brilliant. Though it was brilliant, it wasn’t really offensive. And judging by the reaction on the Internet, I wasn’t the only one who wasn’t offended. Ultimately, it was amusing thanks to its actually meaningful interpretation of personalities juxtaposed with an absurd, practically meaningless intellectual endeavor. And the icing on the cake came from the peculiar idiosyncrasies of Who’s on Top?‘s format (“Ten more minutes.” “Don’t rush me!”/”I don’t want to picture that – pass.” “Correct”/”I want to lose it all!) A-
Legitimate Channels
Ommegang Rare VOS
So sue me.
I have conducted extensive research (ie: Googled for it) and have not found the phrase used anywhere as an official razor, but would it be nice if it came to be? Whenever the faithful or trolls leap into the fray with some baseless assertion, just cutting it short with a “That violates Hitchens’ Razor” would save a lot of time and effort.
This 1990 date by soprano saxophonist Roberto Ottaviano's fine quartet is one of the highlights of Italian jazz from the era. Featuring pianist Stefano Battaglia, drummer Ettore Fioravanti, and bassist Piero Leveratto (who also plays banjo), the seven tracks here reveal the deep lyrical intricacies of the Italian vision of jazz. With all compositions being written within the band, there is already a seamless dynamic at work in the proceedings that takes into account strengths and weaknesses. Ottaviano was influenced more by Steve Lacy's technique on the soprano than John Coltrane's; his nuancing of phrase and interval are especially notable on "Simple Bonheur," where he moves through a series of complex pitches with a seamless ease, winding his lines through Battaglia's nearly pointillistic melodic construction. The complex harmonics at the heart of "Pamphlet," which begin somewhere in the blues, lilt over to pastoral modalism and then fly off into a free swinging post-post-bop -- with a killer bass solo by Leveratto. The album ends with "Silhouette," which showcases the staggered harmonic inventions of Battaglia. His Lennie Tristano-ish lines intersect with the rhythm section in flatted fifths and augmented sevenths before rushing off to the top of the register to engage the blues with Ottaviano with a shimmering ostinato. Yeah, now this is jazz!
Like I said before, Hard mode of Nett’s Pyramid has become a Tower Defense mode, which means that you have have to defend things while waves of monsters come out. In this case you have to defend an obelisk against 20 waves of monsters. Defending this obelisk also grants you Nett’s Emeralds. . These Emeralds can be spent at Duarte. He sells stuff:
OLSEN DP. Should RNs be forced to get the flu vaccine? Am J Nurs 2006; 106: 76-79.
I originally got a recipe from one of my favorite cook books. (It’s actually a mook.) I, however, altered it so that it’s easier for non-Japanese and new to Japanese cooking people.
The life you live,
GAH!!!
1997 Camelot Knight (3rd), Dakyns Boy (8th), Grange Brake (Refused 27th); 1998 EARTH SUMMIT (WON); 1999 Earth Summit (8th), Camelot Knight
The candidates will by submitting their application handle over all rights of the TV and radio- recordings to the Promoter, this includes all pictures taken on- and off stage.
That is: I want to find and highlight good beer here in Japan, telling the stories of those who make it, enjoy it and promote it. Meanwhile, I want to celebrate the culture and lifestyle of good beer here and around the world.
But, I can't think of one single thing that isn't meant to be painted.
1) Create a Post with a mention and link to the person who presented the Noblesse Oblige Award.
Of pain may slow…
3.Peel the skin and grind by adding little by little milk.
After church that afternoon me, Jansen (my youngest bro) & my mom went & ate Lupe Tortillas then we convinced her to go out to Trader's Village to look at the pups out there.
Could generate strange questions
—From "Celebrating the Fourth of July—1776-style!," published at 7 a.m. on July 4, 2010: "As I am working both today and tomorrow—alas, the international Wall Street Journal editions don't celebrate America's independence; at least I get time-and-a-half for my holiday labors, though—I'll be celebrating Independence Day in my mind..."
Well today has been a exciting day. My nephew came over this morning and spent the day with us. He got here early this morning around 8AM. Plus Charlie got home last night. So everyone was here to spend time with my mother-in-law. Around 11AM my nephew passed out on the couch and Charlie took off to go hunting. About 3:30PM Jason the PT showed up for her to start PT today. This is her first real day of it. The kids are busy doing chores. They got to get their room cleaned up and put their dirty cloths in the washer.
Holding onto something
Of other note in college football:
Even our flowers are dressed up for the Holidays.
Of course it’s not as though Silent House was really shot all in one take. That would have taken an incredible amount of preparation and pretty masterful coordination between cast and crew; here we get a lot of times in which the screen goes dark for some reason or another, and edits could be concealed there as well as in other occasions. But still, it’s the illusion that makes the stunt work, and it’s Ms. Olsen that makes the illusion work, bringing a lot of pleasantly surprising weight to a role that a lesser actress would have played in much more generic ways just screaming her way through it. The camera is always very close on her character, Sarah, and if you’ve seen Martha Marcy May Marlene (which I gave an A+ to) then you know how perfect Ms. Olsen’s face is to follow around in tight shots; and I don’t mean that just because she’s beautiful (though she most definitely is), but because she does a lot with her expressions, and here when she’s allowed to just show a quiet kind of terror in her face is when the film works best.
Fly into that space across the Shilov boundaries
The cost of living is definitely LOWER than many other places...but so is the COST OF DYING.
The Constitution does provide a provision to throw out the tyrants (WH,EPA,Liberal-controlling-bureaucrats &congressmen writing all of our laws) and restore Constitutional-order once again!
JAM (c)photography 2003 (c)text 18March2012
Halifax’s Library and Information Science Holiday Social is back – Join your friends and colleagues for an evening of great food, door prizes, fun, and holiday cheer at our annual Holly Jolly!
23. Daryl Hall (Hall & Oates)
My pitch was right alongside the river, and consequently found myself in a Force 2 1/2 gale!
See for yourself :)
Volunteers deserve a bit of credit for their do-good attitude, and that’s exactly what Reward Volunteers aims to do — it is in the name, after all.
647 D-VI/11/1973. “On the Meaning of Freedom of Speech.” The Irregular Seminar in Political Philosophy, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Right: Photo of a skull identified as belonging to Philip Taylor Kramer, discovered in Decker Canyon (near Malibu, CA) in 1999.
I was amazed at how easy and fast this was, I was more amazed at how easy the clean up is! I thought for sure with oil and sugar I'd be scrubbing a pot after I was done, but not at all! There was hardly a stuck on mess. This is such an inexpensive snack. Sure it isn't the most healthy but hot kettle corn with that caramelized sugar crunch is SO good fresh.
“Preston’s Paradise has been running a push cart market for about five years now, and we were looking for a way to scale up and be a more consistent access point to fresh food in our neighborhood,” said Ryan Kuck, West Philadelphia Fresh Food Hub project manager.
The seventy-something Italian pianist follows Soprais (El Gallo Rojo, 2011), with his long-established quartet, by adding the early jazz instruments of clarinet and trombone, played respectively by Daniele D'Argaro and Mauro Ottolini. On the live Traditions And Clusters he also invites his contemporary , drummer Han Bennink, to sit in on two tracks.
George and I decided to take advantage of the busses that are in Cape Town, Totally geared for tourists. We left after a nice continental breakfast and headed to the V&A waterfront to get some tickets for the bus. we opted for the 2 day pass, and in all sorts of excitement hopped on the red bus.
To choke the life out of you
The concurrency of these two changes dramatically reduced the morale and culture on the unit. Working became a chore and there has been a notable change in the attitudes of the nurses. I would be lying if I said this had no negative impact on the patients we nurse: the ramifications are in-direct, but nonetheless present. Nursing more patients from outside our core practice areas, we started missing the little things, like using the tricks learnt from working on a specialty unit for years, passed on by osmosis. High patient turnover pushes staff to deliver care in smaller, task-orientated blocks which can reduce the patient’s experience. We have shallower relationships and often are still completing discharge paperwork as the next patient arrives for their four hours with us. I would not call it unsafe: it is just less personal.
Keep in mind my lawyer had been in touch with their lawyer and the bank and had been told nothing of this. This deal just kept getting more and more complicated, I had no idea nor did my lawyer what a "loan arranger" was, but turned out it was more or less a 3rd party loan company who would be guaranteeing the loan, not the bank. It was all very confusing to my lawyer and me, just felt like this deal would never go through.
to accept you have a hulking
I began to dance and sing, "I'll tumble for you, I'll tumble for you, ...."
7. Duplicate a photo, but use different crops of that photo
JTRTK Blog (jtrtkblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Lies. I had a juicy, pulpy, stringy mess on my hands, countertop, and clothes. No cute little cubes. Nothing even remotely cute or cube-like happened. So I went for plan B, AKA hack away at the mango until it obeys, and squeeze the juice out of the portion that won’t. I want it on the record that I have never claimed to be a mango expert.
First, I put some water on and boiled my pasta, adding a few pinches of salt to the water.
I once got a stubborn patch of ivy in our backyard to grow exactly where I wanted it to grow by trimming branches of an overhanging tree to allow sunlight into just the right area and adding an old fence post.
The last full day. After a morning walk around the hotel we went back to Baku. On the way we had hundreds of Rosy Starling and some migrating raptors and also few Red-winged Pratincoles around Besh Barmag.
Note: Lights which draw power from the camera battery will reduce the battery’s charge time.
The reviews are still, largely, complimentary.
I'm finally going to brew the Imperial IPA that I purchased the ingredients for, (weeks ago).
As a general rule, I am an early bird and Cory is a night owl. It doesn't matter where I am (I could be on the moon), I wake up at 6:30 a.m. CST. Therefore, I woke up at 5:30 a.m. sharp every single morning while in Mexico. Since Cory prefers to sleep in, I immediately came up with the perfect morning routine:
But a girl cannot live on ice cream alone. So Delicious has also introduced a new line of almond milks:
If you can bear it, watch Colton and his dad describe the stuff that could only be known from a near-visit to heaven. Colton says he saw that Jesus was REALLY BIG: “He can actually fit the entire world into his hands. “ And Jesus had a “rough but kind face, sea-blue eyes, and a smile that lit up the heavens.” Colton also learned that there are no old people in heaven, either—it’s all “young adults.” That’s great news for those of us who feared being at God’s big chair with our walkers, artificial knees, and Depends diapers.
If you can find stillness in the midst of one of the noisiest, most crowded, most frantic intersections in all of New York, then you have tasted one (or all) of the three final limbs of yoga as outlined in Patanjali’s Yoga Sutras: dharana (concentration), dhyana (meditation), samadhi (absorption). The opportunity to experience one-pointed focus in the midst of myriad distractions will be put on public display on Monday, June 21st, 2010: this year’s date for Times Square Alliance’s annual Solstice in Times Square.
2) Better Service
now you ?
PORCELAIN RAFT - Strange Weekend
When I barreled this beer, I siphoned off a bottle for my mum and dad. Given the enthusiasm for it when they cracked it open last night, ("We've had worse in Wetherspoon's") bottle conditioning might be the way forward for my next brew. The Wherry kit is notorious for stuck fermentations - which I avoided - and failing to properly drop bright - which I didn't. There's a faint haze, but it's a helluva lot better than my last effort which looked like Bisto.
As I was sitting between matches today one girl stopped over to tell me how much she respects what I'm doing. One of the officials from the World Team Trials stopped by to tell me she remembers me and to wish me best of luck.
Do the illustrations capture your vision of the story?
Structure does not, by definition or intent, mean rigid. Structure does not mean unbending. Structure does not mean coercive, or manipulative. Structure does not imply the restriction of choice. No, structure, at its most direct, simply means a framework within which we live our lives and make our moment-to-moment and day-to-day decisions.
Funny that, because I believe in work. I haven't had a full-time job since my daughter was born in 1998, but I have scraped a living instead with various part-time and freelance posts.
Moon smiled at his little friend.
for hundreds
Mazze RI, Fujinaga M, Rice SA, et al. Reproductive and teratogenic effects of nitrous oxide, halothane, isoflurane, and enflurance in Sprague-Dawley rats. Anesthesiology 1986; 64: 339-344.
One of the big questions I have for Freewheel is why he decided that the bubble wrap would work better on the outside of the box. When I look at the image above as well as his own photo, it would seem to me that the bubble wrap would provide more benefit inside the to-go container. Based on his post, he wrapped the box in bubble wrap to protect it. But isn’t protecting the cupcake the most important? Is it a chicken and egg issue? You tell me.
You get around 900-1200 calories a day (depending on fruit intake) if you follow the plan, so you won’t be a zombie for three days, but it can be slightly difficult at first. Don’t plan on working out too hard during these days due to the calorie intake. The cleanse can also be modified to 1 or 2 days to fit your liking or schedule. It’s not meant to be done for more than 3 days.
The Journal is a scientist Magazine of the University of Oslo. in march 2011, the magazine published proof of widespread sexual abuse of animals in Norway.
Yeah, this green belt matches nothing in the outfit. I’m pretending it’s brown.
Sid Catlett (drums)
I can remember when I swore we’d be different. Sitting on our stylish (if battered) brown leather sofa, patting my humongous bump, I surveyed our living room. OK, so it would never appear in a home interiors magazine, but with its Orla Kiely accessories and the one-off pieces we’d accumulated on our travels, it had a kind of shabby charm “We’re not going to be a couple who just let their kids take over”, I said, while my husband nodded sagely. Our home wouldn’t be engulfed by a mountain of lurid plastic. Instead, our kids were going to enjoy playing with just a few wooden toys. Move our ornaments to out of reach places? No way! We’ll just leave them – it’s a good way for Junior to learn that no means no. And we weren’t going to install those ugly stairgates, either - we’d just have to keep a close eye on our kids.
This is short, sweet, and odd for me at this point. I’ve promised myself that I wouldn’t delve into depressive matters because that isn’t me anymore. I’m not that guy and frankly, with Nora (no link; this actually involves her so she’s my girlfriend, not someone who I link to occasionally) in my life, I no longer feel pulled to the angst of my teen and college years.
The good news for brewers is this:
Cochin
we are both starting to get really nervous (and really excited) and i think that is taking it’s toll on us (in small, non-permanent ways). we go from having the most loving moments ever, talking about the baby and the future and our life together, to arguing about everything: whether we can afford to buy plates (seriously, sometimes i wonder about my husband…), whether or not sex is okay at this stage, how many diapers we should order, if i’m being sensitive and overreacting about everything (which is probably true sometimes) or he’s just an insensitive jerk (which is definitely true sometimes) and a million other things.
The failed harvests exacerbated what was already a catastrophe. Somalia is the theatre for a brutal war between the transitional government, backed by western nations and supported by African Union troops, and armed opposition groups, most notably al-Shabaab. It is this war, combined with the internecine rivalries of the various Somali clans, that has kept independent international assistance away from many communities. The Somali people are trapped between various forces trying to weaken their opponents. There is virtually no access to healthcare in vast tracts of land across the country.
I’m not going to write about every single gelato shop that I went to, but I want to write about one in particular that I went to in Bologna. There was a gelato shop featured in Let’s go Italy that one of the girls with us had read about, so we gave it a shot. I cannot for the life of me remember what it was called, but they have over 100 flavors that they change out every few days. They have about 20 flavors each day, and each one is named after movies! It’s a really fun little shop and they have a wall of the movies that they’re named after. They were very welcoming and the gelato was so good!
Jesus is the Christ, the one who heals the sick, the one who raises the dead, the one who multiplies the bread, the one who calms the storm, the one who saves the lost, the one who opens the blind eyes, and the one who brings peace.
Goodnight from me.
In the issue, Brubaker reveals these essays "aren't reprinted in our trades or in the digital versions of the comics, they're a bonus for you, the people who make our books possible by supporting the single issues as they come out. A thanks for not waiting on the trade."
No one was ever quite sure how many CSAs there were. The federal government didn’t track the number; at the same time, for a variety of reasons, many CSAs wanted little to do with government or larger systems.
By 1947 the old building on President’s Hill had run its course, and the Sisters and the “Belles of St. Mary’s” moved to the Italianate villa of “Commodore” E. H. Perry at Forty-first and Red River, north of Hancock Golf Course. Various other buildings and a swimming pool were added to the ten-and-a-half-acre property. When St. Edward’s Boy’s High School closed in 1966, St. Mary’s Academy went co-ed, changing its name to “Holy Cross High School,” but the school closed in 1972 due to lack of funds and a decline in the number of nuns in the Sisters of the Holy Cross order.
This is a Disney Channel Original Movie, so of course, it is sweet and cute and completely appropriate for family or slumber party viewing!
So, take that! It’s not on my site yet, but it is here, and I still think it’s wonderful! I hope you all do too!! Please let me know what you think on my FB fanpage….(if you really like what you read, you may even want to become my FB Friend! ) Any and all constructive criticism will be taken with a grain of salt, and all else shall be completely ignored! Thank you for your participation! I love you! I’m here till Thursday! Try the veal and don’t forget to tip your waitresses!!
Well, I am vowing in 2012 this is her year!
Bake for 25 – 30 minutes, or until shiny and slightly cracked on top and feels firm to the touch. If they seem a bit undercooked, that’s okay. They firm up a little as they cool and you don’t want them overly hard. Place on rack to cool, then cut into squares or rectangles (cut an 8×4 grid or a 9×4 grid).
Wu quotes philosopher Terence McKenna: “I am not a guru. I am simply just a witness. Just a witness.”
As the dead carcasses of unburied men
Fry prawn shells with 4 tbs of cooking oil in a separate pan for 5 to 8 minutes, using a potato masher to press down the prawn heads to release all the goodness. Add the content of the pan to the pot with the stock and simmer for 30 minutes, remove the solids and season well with salt.
I teach in a charter school. There are a lot of teachers and school districts in general who don't like charter schools, but I have to tell you- after teaching in one, I definitely see their worth! Charter schools for those who don't know are, I like to say they're a mix of the best of both public and private schools (at least mine is). See this Wikipedia entry for more info. The school I teach at has been so successful that we've expanded to 6 elementary schools (K-8) and 2 high schools this year, with plans to open at least one more elementary and high school next year as well!
The Korean People’s Army Supreme Command warned on Monday that it will soon launch “special actions” against South Korea for what it called blasphemy against the country’s new leadership. It denounced South Korean President Lee Myung-bak and some of the South’s media reports for showing disrespect.
Now, don't you dare laugh
Eventually though, we started hitting 19, one by one. When hitting 19, a little pop-up gave us advice on where to hunt next.
it is amazing in New York today - grey and cool, the weather shifts to September. And so we are revving up again for October - Domestic Violence Awareness Month.
We thought we could stop here.
For the sake of brevity, I won’t go into detail on each essay in the book, though a full review can easily be written on every one. Instead, I will say that Part Two, ”¡Ni Una Mas!,” especially appealed to me. This section contained many critical readings of feminist and activist responses that have taken place over the years, and it raised many questions about ethics and the “othering” of the victims and their families. In 2004, for instance, a large V-Day march was organized by Eve Ensler. In “The Suffering of the Other,” the authors write:
Tom Scudamore
For those of us who love a flat shoe then the coming season is a joy due to the wonderful Chanel collection and the sublime Valentino one. Both shows gave us flatties a get out of jail card to eschew the high heel fashion brigade, although I am mightily tempted by some mules.
29Never let it be said that we were false to the Lord, turning back this day from him and building an altar for burned offerings and meal offerings and offerings of beasts, in addition to the altar of the Lord our God which is before his House.
pop culture guilty pleasure? The Glades is one of my guilty pleasures. It’s sunny, slightly funny and doesn’t tax the brain. Love it.
Their belief, by the way, has been pinned to the MMR for, oh, a decade or more now? Except that if you'll note Table I in this study, the MMR is the one vaccine the authors list as containing no mercury at all. I asked it in 2008, and I'll ask it again: Which is it people? Is it MMR? Is it mercury? Oh, right. It's neither, hence the obvious confusion here and a study still in search of a hypothesis. The authors slip in a rationale for MMR-as-autism-culprit in their MRI methods section: "These timeframes for neuroimaging were chosen to determine whether the MMR may have contributed to any observed neurological features." No rationale. No background. But, must feed the faithful.
On the bus, I was struck with the idea that perhaps at the end of time, everyone just comes together.
One such bout of nostalgia sent me off to a cinema on the Left Bank last week to see a press screening of the Australian film, Samson & Delilah. And while it would be difficult to describe the experience as uplifting, I challenge anyone to go and watch this excellent film and not come away having been moved by it.
I wrote about it here on the kjpugs blog. I hope you guys will participate. Comment on my entry (posting tomorrow morning on the kjpugs blog, ohhh around 8:30am Eastern time) if you post for BBAD. I would love to see some of my awesome wedding blog friends participate!
“OK!” I laughed.
“Well, I was hoping you’d say yes, and I just thought I’d be prepared”
Next year, I hope to include Teagan in the event. I think her taste in food will continue to expand over the next year and she could really enjoy it. I would also make sure we plan to be there for the entire 5 hours. I'd love to get several of the food offerings and go sit in a shady spot and just enjoy and then lay back and relax a bit. This would help with the overstuffing thing, I think. They also offered a speaker series but I wasn't able to get to any of them- if I plan effectively next year, I think I can make that work better, too. I'd be sure to bring a big bottle of water, too. Wine and beer are great but I was soon quite parched and water was a better cleanser of the palette.
#26 nourishing food
I decided not to pursue it anymore, fearful of revealing my own pregnancy. But after that meeting I tried to make sense of it all.
For young women in much of Britain, dependence does not mean dependence on the government: that, for them, is independence. Dependence means any kind of reliance on the men who have impregnated them who, of course, regard their own subventions from the state as pocket money, to be supplemented by a little light trafficking.
But it's the additional stuff that I love. The baby wraps that can be capes, or togas, or ghost outfits. The five different gloves that serve as Super Whatevers, or Ninja whatevers, or medical protection. The lanyards from various conferences. The scarves that can be utility belts, or Ninja wraps, or Knightly garb. The swords of assorted length, colour and degradation. And the hats - so many hats! Hard hats, police hats, beanies, helmets.
“You’ll be a little groggy,” Tattletale grabbed the last remaining chair from beside the kitchen table to sit down opposite the vigilante ‘heroine’. “The fight took a lot out of you, and we tased you, and I took the liberty of sticking you with one of your own tranquilizer bolts.”
And release their hold upon former day.
Our present house is entirely unsuitable for the game.
﻿Please be sure to sure to upload your creation for this week's challenge to your blog or public photo gallery, and then leave a link that goes directly to your project in the Inlinkz form at the bottom of this post by noon on Tuesday, October 12th. Don't forget, you must always use a stamp carried by 7 Kids College Fund to be eligible for the prize.
She timed her tears from the moment it leaped out till it reached the ground.
According to an NIH Workshop publication on Non-verbal School Aged Children with Autism, “…it is a very significant challenge to assess these individuals with traditional standardized instruments. Our current measurement tools have relatively low reliability and validity for this population. The presence of even one word, or some echolalic speech, appears to be a significant predictor for the acquisition of spoken language after five years of age. In both research and treatment planning, it is important to distinguish whether children are nonverbal (i.e., no spoken language), preverbal (i.e., younger children who have not yet developed verbal language), or non-communicative (i.e., having neither verbal nor nonverbal communication skills).”
Another big thanks is due to Ruth and the folks in the photo department of the Free Press. The videos are great...I never get to see myself on a program, so I appreciated the chance to say, "gee, that's what I look like at work!", and the opportunity you've given me to share what I do with friends and family far away.
Last night, the Columbia Beer Enthusiasts had a dark beer tasting. As you can see from the list below, dark beers can be awfully varied and we barely scratched the surface of possible styles. This was our first tasting in a while. We held the get-together at Uprise for the first time and plan to be back in the near future. Be on the lookout for a holiday tasting and Yankee Swap this December for paying members. Speaking of which, it's not too late to pay dues.
Part 4 of 5 Continued May 5, 2012
Antipasti plate, with meat, cheese, crackers, olives and cranberries
Throughout history great nations and empires have had worshipped various pantheon of gods and goddess,s. The romans had theirs ..Jupiter and Juno king and queen of the gods, Neptune god of sea, Pluto god of death, Apollo god of sun..etc. The Greeks had Zeus and Hera as king and queen of their gods, Poseidon god of Sea, hades god of the underworld, and Athena the goddess of wisdom. The Egyptians had Ra the Sun god and Amun for creation, Isis the god of magic, Thoth god of wisdom and Osiris the god of death. The Norse of the germanic tribes had Odin and Frigga as King and Queen of the gods and goddess,s, Thor god of sky and thunder, Loki the trickster and god of sly,and of course the Valkyries warrior goddess who carried the dead warrior’s to Valhalla.
August 2009
15. Captain Corelli's Mandolin - Louis de Bernieres
Parts 2 and 3 will consist of making chicken stock and then using the baked squash to make a Curried Butternut & Acorn Squash Soup!! For making the stock, in case you are not blessed with owning a fine meshed sieve, a clean dishtowel in a colander will work well for straining your chicken broth out (a great little trick that Chris Lloyd and I learned last year when hosting Thanksgiving!).
We reached the heavy double doors in seconds. He jerked one open effortlessly. I’d needed all my strength just to squeeze through that same door earlier. To him, the thick wood might as well have been cardboard. I raised an eyebrow and mentally listed the benefits of going to gym class.
When you look at the importance of the bridge and the length of time it's been around for you get a certain sense of irony from the fact that Dairsie Bridge has been standing and doing it's job proudly for the last 500 years but Fife council's shoddy workmanship can't even last a decade. Well done there lads.
Center yourselves now. Ground yourselves firmly into the energy of your dear Gaia. Gather your energy about you. Picture the lion just before he leaps. That is where you are in this moment.
My training plan at the moment is to run on Monday, Wednesday and Friday mornings, swim on Tuesdays and Thursdays and cycle at some stage over the weekends. I’ve mapped out my 2km run route near home. I haven’t been for a run since Monday so I went this morning even though it’s Saturday…
greediness. One sniff of her salt sluice
It may be a combination of my OCD or the fact that I almost always feel overwhelmed but more than once a day it seems that I check my phone with the intentions of finding out the time only to realize a few short minutes later that I was not paying attention and did not in fact have a clue what time it was.
I blog because my hunky husband’s work schedule (he is a firefighter) often takes him away 3-4 days in a row so I am on my own with the kids which makes life challenging and interesting…
In honor of the troops, please remember to click on the song link below to familiarize yourselves with the tune and to have more fun singing along to today’s Holiday Season inspired song parody.
Both ED and I have lost a child through miscarriage, and didn’t feel we could tell the other about it, until this haunting started getting more and more familiar.
* – Nationally Televised Game
So it went like this…
And thus ended that career path.
Extremely satisfied by these songs his eyes opened wide with delighted love. Being magnanimous, he gave the bards a lot of money, clothing and jewelry.
After 2 and a bit years and nearly 700 posts I have decided to call it a day. I know what you're thinking, "Why now? Why not last year?". Pfft, whatever. My reasons, like trophies at Manchester United, are multitude.
The current Alberta Energy Ministry’s policy is to consult with aboriginal groups when development has the potential to adversely affect traditional uses and their constitutionally protected rights to hunt, trap, and fish. The provincial government stands by their stance that is does not consult with First Nation at the preliminary lease-granting stage because there are many steps to go before tar sands development actually occurs. Currently, the government’s policy is to simply post lease sales online and not consult directly with First Nations.
In her search for spirituality, “you revert from what attracts you and swim toward that which is difficult.” The more difficult her journey becomes, the more flawed we see her character. Still, as challenged as she becomes, she never gives up or gives in.
Ever since Charlie Sheen got the boot from Two and a half Men you could argue that he has been better than ever. He recieved a huge settlement from Warner Brothers, had one of the most anticipated roasts on Comedy Central, and has been seen getting back together with his ex-wife Denise Richards.
by Jennie Churchman
We started these meetings in March 2010, each time with people from different genders, nationalities, languages, tops, bottoms and switches, D/s and SM oriented people, experienced people and newbies, returning and new participants!
If you'd like me to feature your cloth diaper, accessory, baby wearing (etc.) giveaway next week, send a link and description to maria at change-diapers.com, or Fill out my contact form for readers.
